


Exhibit
10.48
 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
720-30 S. CLARK STREET,
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
REAL ESTATE SALE AGREEMENT
 
THIS REAL ESTATE SALE AGREEMENT (this “Agreement”)
is made as of the 18th day of June, 2010 (the “Effective
Date”), by and between STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC,
a Wisconsin limited liability company (“Seller”), with
an office at c/o Stark Investments, 3600 South Lake Drive, St. Francis,
Wisconsin 53235, and BEHRINGER HARVARD
MULTIFAMILY OP I LP, a Delaware limited partnership, (“Purchaser”), with an office at 15601 Dallas Parkway,
Suite 600, Addison, Texas 75001.
 
RECITALS
 
A.                              Seller is the
owner of a certain parcel of real estate (the “Real
Property”) in the City of Chicago, County of Cook, State of
Illinois, which parcel is more particularly described in attached Exhibit A,
and upon which is located a multi-family residential apartment building
including street level retail space commonly known as the “Burnham Pointe
Apartments.”
 
B.                                Seller desires
to sell to Purchaser, and Purchaser desires to purchase from Seller, the
Property (as hereinafter defined), each in accordance with and subject to the
terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement.
 
THEREFORE, in consideration of the above Recitals, the mutual covenants
and agreements herein set forth and the benefits to be derived therefrom, and
other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are
hereby acknowledged, Purchaser and Seller agree as follows:
 
1.                                       PURCHASE AND
SALE. Subject to and in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth
in this Agreement, Purchaser shall purchase from Seller and Seller shall sell
to Purchaser the Real Property, together with: (i) all buildings and
improvements owned by Seller and located on the Real Property (the “Improvements”) and any and all of Seller’s rights,
easements, licenses and privileges presently thereon or appertaining thereto;
(ii) Seller’s right, title and interest, if any, in and to any land lying
in the bed of any street, alley, road or avenue (whether open, closed or proposed)
within, in front of, behind or otherwise adjoining the Real Property or any of
it, to the extent such land is appurtenant only to the Real Property and not
any other adjacent property owned by Seller or its affiliates;
(iii) Seller’s right, title and interest in and to the leases (the “Leases”) affecting the Property or any part thereof, other
than the Former Tenant Lease Files (as hereinafter defined); (iv) all
furniture, furnishings, fixtures, equipment (excluding computer hardware and
software), tools and other tangible property (collectively, the “Personal Property”) owned by Seller, located on the Real
Property and used solely in connection therewith, a list of which is attached
hereto as Exhibit B; (v) except as otherwise provided herein,
all right, title and interest of Seller under any and all of the union,
maintenance, service, advertising and other like contracts and agreements with
respect to the ownership and operation of the Property (collectively, the “Service Contracts”); all to the extent assignable to
 
1




 
Purchaser and applicable to the period from and after the Closing (as
hereinafter defined); and (vi) Seller’s right, title and interest in and
to all intangible personal property relating to the Real Property and the
Improvements (including governmental permits, licenses and approvals;
warranties and guarantees, architectural drawings, plans and specifications,
as-built drawings for the Property, advertising material, trademarks, trade names
or symbols under which the Property, or any portion thereof, is operated
including the name “Burnham Pointe” and the Internet domain name
www.burnhampointe.com (the “Website”), and
telephone exchange number and, to the extent relating solely to the Real
Property or Improvements, any development rights), if and to the extent
transferable without third party consent or cost or liability to Seller (the “Intangible Personal Property”) (items (i) through
(vi) above, together with the Real Property, are collectively referred to
in this Agreement as the “Property”). All
of the foregoing expressly excludes all property owned by tenants or other
users or occupants of the Property.
 
2.                                       PURCHASE PRICE. The total
consideration to be paid by Purchaser to Seller for the Property is
Eighty-Eight Million and No/100ths Dollars ($88,000,000.00) (the “Purchase Price”). The Purchase Price shall be paid as
follows:
 
2.1                                 Earnest Money.
 
2.1.1                        Seller,
Purchaser and Chicago Title Insurance Company, 712 Main St., Suite 2000E,
Houston, Texas 77002-3223, Attention: Jimmy Erwin, 713-238-9191 telephone,
713-238-9190 fax (james.erwin@fnf.com) (“Escrowee”)
shall concurrently herewith execute Earnest Money Escrow Instructions, in the
form attached hereto as Exhibit D, and Purchaser shall deliver to
Escrowee, within two business days after Purchaser’s receipt of a fully
executed copy or original of this Agreement, earnest money in the sum of Two
Million and No/100ths Dollars ($2,000,000.00), which sum, together with any
interest earned thereon net of investment costs, is referred to in this
Agreement as the “Earnest Money”. The Earnest Money shall be invested as
specified in the Earnest Money Escrow Instructions. Any and all interest earned
on the Earnest Money shall be reported to Purchaser’s federal tax
identification number. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Seller and Purchaser
hereby acknowledge and agree that Two Hundred Fifty Thousand and No/100ths
Dollars ($250,000.00) of the total Earnest Money deposit (sometimes separately
referred to herein as the, “Option Fee”)
shall be deemed earned by Seller immediately as of the Effective Date, with the
Option Fee being owed and paid to Seller (and not returned to Purchaser) in the
event that this Agreement is terminated for any reason (other than pursuant to
Section 7.1, in which event the Option Fee shall be returned to
Purchaser), whether before or after the expiration of the Review Period
(hereinafter defined).
 
2.1.2                        If the
transaction closes in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, at Closing,
the Earnest Money shall be delivered by Escrowee to Seller as part payment of
the Purchase Price. If the transaction fails to close due to a default on the
part of Purchaser, Seller shall have the remedy options provided for in
Section 7.2 below. If the transaction fails to close due to a default on
the part of Seller, Purchaser shall have the remedy options provided for in
Section 7.1 below. The provisions of this Agreement regarding the
disposition of the Earnest Money and the Option Fee following a termination of
this Agreement shall survive termination of this Agreement.
 
2




 
2.2                                 Cash at Closing. At Closing,
Purchaser shall pay to Seller, with current, federal funds wire transferred to
an account designated by Seller in writing, an amount equal to the Purchase
Price, minus the sum of the Earnest Money which Seller shall receive at Closing
from the Escrowee, and plus or minus, as the case may require, the closing
prorations and adjustments to be made pursuant to Section 4.4 below.
 
3.                                       EVIDENCE OF
TITLE. 
 
3.1                                 Title Insurance. Seller shall,
within fifteen (15) days after the Effective Date, deliver to Purchaser a
current commitment for an ALTA Form 2006 Owner’s Title Insurance Policy
(the “Title Commitment”), in the amount of
the Purchase Price, issued by Chicago Title Insurance Company (national office
located at 171 N. Clark Street, Chicago, Illinois) (“Title
Insurer”). For purposes hereof, the term “Owner’s Policy” shall mean
a basic form of ALTA 2006 Owner’s Title Insurance Policy insuring fee simple
title to the Real Property and Improvements issued by the Title Insurer
pursuant to the Title Commitment, including all standard and general exceptions
and exclusions raised in such form of owner’s policy. At Closing, subject to
the provisions of Section 14.21 below, Seller shall, at its sole cost and
expense, cause the Title Insurer to issue the Owner’s Policy (or “marked-up” title
commitment unconditionally committing the Title Insurer to issue such Owner’s
Policy) to Purchaser, pursuant to and in accordance with the Title Commitment,
insuring fee simple title to the Real Property and the Improvements thereon in
Purchaser as of the Closing Date, subject only to the Permitted Exceptions and
those other exceptions as Purchaser may approve or be deemed to have approved
pursuant to Section 3.3 below. Purchaser may request that Title Insurer
issue, but Seller shall have no obligation to pay for or to cause Title Insurer
to issue, any available endorsements to the Owner’s Policy. For purposes
hereof, the term “Permitted Exceptions” shall mean collectively, (i) the
general exceptions (unless Purchaser obtains coverage over the general
exceptions), (ii) those exceptions which are more fully described on
attached Exhibit E and (iii) exceptions which become Permitted
Exceptions pursuant to Section 3.3. Except as permitted under this
Agreement, no additional encumbrances may be created on the Property by Seller
after the Effective Date without the prior consent of Purchaser, which consent
may not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or delayed.
 
3.2                                 Survey. Within five
(5) days after the Effective Date, Seller shall deliver to Purchaser one
copy of the most recent existing plat of survey (if any) of the Real Property (the
“Existing Survey”) in Seller’s
possession. Purchaser may obtain, at Seller’s expense, an updated or new
as-built survey of the Real Property (the “Updated Survey”)
prepared by the surveyor who provided the Existing Survey, in which event,
Purchaser shall deliver the Updated Survey to Seller and Title Insurer as soon
as practicable after receipt by Purchaser.
 
3.3                                 Title Review. Purchaser
shall have until the date which is five (5) days prior to expiration of
the Review Period (as hereinafter defined) (the “Title Review
Period”) to give Seller a detailed notice objecting to any exception
or condition contained in the Title Commitment or shown on the Updated Survey,
if any, other than those Permitted Exceptions which are listed on Exhibit E.
If Purchaser does not give notice of any objections to Seller within the Title
Review Period, Purchaser shall be deemed to have approved the title as shown in
the Title Commitment, the title exceptions, and all matters shown on the
Existing Survey or the Updated Survey, if any, and any such exceptions or
matters shall become “Permitted
 
3




 
Exceptions”. If Purchaser provides timely objections, Seller shall have
until the date which is one (1) business day prior to the expiration of
the Review Period (the “Title Cure Period”)
in which to elect, by written notice to Purchaser, either (i) to cure or
attempt to cure Purchaser’s objections, or (ii) not to cure Purchaser’s
objections; provided, however, notwithstanding the foregoing, Seller shall have
no obligation whatsoever to cure or attempt to cure any of Purchaser’s
objections. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, Seller shall be obligated,
at Closing, to cause Title Insurer to remove (by waiver or endorsement) any (a) mortgage
or deed of trust granted by Seller affecting the Property and
(b) mechanic’s liens with respect to work contracted for by Seller (but
not mechanic’s liens with respect to work contracted for by tenants or other
occupants of the Property) at the Property, provided that Seller has received
written notice of any such mechanic’s lien prior to Closing (collectively, the “Required Cure Items”). In the event that Seller fails to
provide such written notice of its election to proceed under either clause
(i) or (ii) above, Seller shall be deemed to have elected clause
(ii) above. At Seller’s cost and expense, Seller may bond around any such
matters to Title Insurer’s reasonable satisfaction or cause Title Insurer to
endorse over any such objection, and in either event, such objection shall be
deemed cured. If Purchaser provides timely objections and all of Purchaser’s
objections are not cured (or agreed to be cured by Seller in writing prior to
Closing) within the Title Cure Period for any reason, then, on or before the
last day of the Review Period Purchaser shall, as its sole and exclusive
remedy, waiving all other remedies, either: (x) terminate this Agreement
by giving a termination notice to Seller, at which time Escrowee shall return
the Earnest Money (specifically excluding the Option Fee, which shall be paid
to Seller) to Purchaser and the parties shall have no further rights,
liabilities, or obligations under this Agreement (other than those that
expressly survive termination); or (y) waive the uncured objections by not
terminating this Agreement pursuant to this Section 3.3 and thereby be
deemed to have approved the Purchaser’s title as shown in the Title Commitment
the title exception documents, the Existing Survey or the Updated Survey, if
any, and any such uncured objections shall become “Permitted Exceptions”. If
Seller does not timely receive notice of Purchaser’s election to terminate
under this Section 3.3, Purchaser will be deemed to have waived the
uncured objections and to approve the title as shown in the Title Commitment
the title exception documents, the Existing Survey or the Updated Survey, if
any, and such uncured objections shall become “Permitted Exceptions”.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Title Commitment raises a title exception
related to that certain Mechanic’s Lien Foreclosure Case filed by Elston
Window & Wall in the Circuit Court of Cook County as Case
No. 08CH46079 and Seller is not able to cause the Title Insurer to remove
or insure over such exception at Closing, then Purchaser shall have the option
of either (i) completing the Closing pursuant to the terms of this
Agreement, in which event Purchaser waives any and all claims related to said
title exception, or (ii) terminating this Agreement and receiving a refund
of the Earnest Money (including the Option Fee), in which event this Agreement
shall be null and void and neither party shall have any obligations under this
Agreement except those which expressly survive termination.
 
3.4                                 Tenant Estoppel Certificate. Seller shall
request and use reasonable efforts to secure from the dry cleaning tenant that
is occupying a portion of the retail space in the Improvements a tenant estoppel
certificate (“Estoppel Certificate”) that is commercially reasonable in
form and substance; provided, however, that under no circumstances shall
delivery of the Estoppel Certificate be a condition to Closing, or shall
Seller’s failure to deliver the Estoppel Certificate constitute a breach or
default under this Agreement. It is agreed that Seller’s
 
4




 
delivery of the Estoppel Certificate shall not be deemed to be a
material obligation under this Agreement.
 
4.                                       CLOSING.
 
4.1                                 Closing Date. The “Closing” of the transaction contemplated by this Agreement
(that is, the payment of the Purchase Price pursuant to a so-called “New York
style” closing, the transfer of title to the Property, and the satisfaction of
all other terms and conditions of this Agreement) shall occur through escrow on
or before 5:00 p.m. (Central Time) on the fifth (5th) business day
following the expiration of the Review Period (hereinafter defined), at the
Houston office of Title Insurer, or at such other time and place as Seller and
Purchaser shall agree in writing (with the parties hereby acknowledging and
agreeing that at the election of Seller or Purchaser, this transaction may be
closed by mail utilizing written escrow instructions not inconsistent with the
terms of this Agreement and applying to the specifics of the transaction contemplated
by this Agreement). The “Closing Date”
shall be the date of Closing.
 
4.2                                 Seller’s Closing Deliveries. At Closing,
Seller shall execute and deliver to Purchaser the following:
 
4.2.1 a “special” Warranty
Deed (the “Deed”) in the form attached hereto
as Exhibit G, subject to the exceptions listed on Exhibit F
attached hereto;
 
4.2.2 a bill of sale in the
form attached hereto as Exhibit H;
 
4.2.3 a letter advising
tenants under the Leases of the change in ownership of the Property in the form
attached hereto as Exhibit I;
 
4.2.4 an Assignment and
Assumption of Leases, Security Deposits and Service Contracts in the form
attached hereto as Exhibit J;
 
4.2.5 an Assignment and
Assumption of Intangibles in the form attached hereto as Exhibit K;
 
4.2.6 an affidavit stating,
under penalty of perjury, Seller’s U.S. taxpayer identification number and that
Seller is not a foreign person within the meaning of Section 1445 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
 
4.2.7 such evidence of
Seller’s power and authority as Title Insurer may reasonably require;
 
4.2.8 a closing statement
(the “Closing Statement”), as required by
Section 4.4 below, setting forth the prorations and adjustments to the
Purchase Price;
 
4.2.9 an update of the Rent
Roll (as hereinafter defined), dated not later than five (5) days before
the Closing Date, certified by Seller
 
5




 
as being, to Seller’s knowledge (as defined in
Section 10.2), true, correct and complete in all material respects; and
 
4.2.10  subject to the provisions of Sections 7.3 and
10.6, a certificate updating Seller’s representations and warranties set forth
in Section 10.1 as if made on the Closing Date.
 
4.3                                 Purchaser’s Closing
Deliveries. At Closing, Purchaser shall execute and deliver to
Seller the following:
 
4.3.1 the funds required
pursuant to Section 2.2 above;
 
4.3.2 a counterpart original
of the Closing Statement referenced in Section 4.2.8 above;
 
4.3.3 counterpart originals
of the Assignment and Assumption of Leases, Security Deposits and Service
Contracts referenced in Section 4.2.4 above;
 
4.3.4 counterpart originals
of the Assignment and Assumption of Intangibles referenced in
Section 4.2.5 above;
 
4.3.5 counterpart originals
of the bill of sale referenced in Section 4.2.2 above.
 
4.3.6 such evidence of
Purchaser’s power and authority as Title Insurer may reasonably require; and
 
4.3.7 a certificate updating
Purchaser’s representations and warranties as if made on the Closing Date as
being true and correct in all material respects (provided that modification of
the representation in Section 10.4.1 to reflect that any assignee of
Purchaser is a limited liability company shall be permitted and shall not be
deemed to breach such representation so long as said limited liability company
is a “Permitted Assignee” (as defined in Section 14.3 below) and Purchaser
and such Permitted Assignee have otherwise complied with all of the
requirements of said Section 14.3 below).
 
4.4                                 Closing Prorations and
Adjustments. Seller shall prepare the Closing Statement of the
prorations and adjustments required by this Agreement and submit it to
Purchaser at least two (2) business days prior to the Closing Date. The
following items are to be prorated, adjusted or credited (as appropriate) as of
the close of business on the Closing Date, it being understood that solely for
purposes of prorations and adjustments, Seller shall be deemed to be the owner
of the Property on the Closing Date and Purchaser shall be deemed to be the
owner of the Property as of the date following the Closing Date:
 
4.4.1 Real estate and
personal property taxes and assessments (referred to herein collectively as the
“Taxes”) shall be paid as follows:
 
 
6




 
1.                                       All Taxes due
and owing as of the Closing Date shall be paid by Seller at or prior to the
Closing;
 
2.                                       The 2009 second
installment real estate tax bill (to be issued and due in late autumn of 2010)
shall be paid by Seller when due as provided for in this Section 4.4.1.2
At Closing, Seller shall deposit in escrow with the Title Insurer pursuant to
escrow instructions mutually agreeable to Seller and Purchaser, the sum of
$582,000, which the parties anticipate will be sufficient to pay the 2009
second installment real estate tax bill. Purchaser shall secure the 2009 second
installment real estate tax bill and deliver copies of the bill to the Title
Insurer and also to Seller. Within five (5) business days after Seller
receives a copy of the 2009 second installment real estate tax bill from Purchaser,
Seller shall deposit with the Title Insurer the amount of any excess of the
2009 second installment real estate tax bill over the amount originally
deposited in the escrow (referred to herein as Seller’s “Additional
Tax Payment Obligation”), if any. If Seller has an Additional Tax
Payment Obligation and Seller fails to make such payment in a timely manner,
Purchaser may deposit the amount of such excess with the Title Insurer, and
Seller shall reimburse Purchaser on demand for the amount of such deposit. Upon
receipt of the 2009 second installment real estate tax bill and funds
sufficient to pay the 2009 second installment real estate tax bill, the Title
Insurer shall pay the 2009 second installment real estate tax bill and notify
Seller and Purchaser that it has done so by mailing the original paid receipt
to Seller with a copy to Purchaser. If the funds originally deposited in escrow
exceed the amount of the 2009 second installment real estate tax bill, the
Title Insurer shall refund the overdeposit to Seller promptly after the Title
Insurer has made payment of the 2009 second installment real estate tax bill.
Provided that Seller timely complies with its Additional Tax Payment
Obligation, Seller shall have no obligation for any late fee payments or
penalties attributable to the late payment of the 2009 second installment real
estate tax bills.
 
3.                                       With respect to
the 2010 real estate taxes on the Property (payable in 2011), Purchaser shall
receive a credit from Seller at Closing in the amount of Five Hundred Thousand
and No/100 Dollars ($500,000.00) and Purchaser shall thereafter be solely and
entirely responsible for the payment of the 2010 real estate taxes on the
Property. Other than the foregoing $500,000.00 credit from Seller to Purchaser
at Closing, Seller shall have no obligation with respect to the payment of the
2010 real estate taxes on the Property, and there shall be no post-closing
adjustment of such credit.
 
4.4.2 the rent payable by
tenants under the Leases; provided, however, that rent and all other sums which
are due and payable to Seller by any tenant but uncollected as of the Closing
(collectively, the “Delinquent Amounts”)
shall not be adjusted at Closing. Seller and Purchaser agree that all rent
received by Seller or Purchaser after Closing will be applied first to rents
that became due and payable after Closing, and second, to those which were due
and payable prior to Closing, in reverse order of maturity. Purchaser
 
7




 
shall make a good faith effort after Closing to
collect all Delinquent Amounts in the usual course of Purchaser’s operation of
the Property, but Purchaser will not be obligated to institute any lawsuit or
other collection procedures to collect such Delinquent Amounts, and all
Delinquent Amounts, if any, collected by Purchaser, shall be remitted to Seller
promptly upon receipt by Purchaser; provided, however, any Delinquent Amounts
received by Purchaser will first be applied to the then-current portion of such
tenant’s rent, then to costs incurred by Purchaser in collecting the delinquent
rents, and then (and only then) to Delinquent Amounts owed with respect to the
period before Closing. At Closing, Seller shall deliver to Purchaser a schedule
of all such Delinquent Amounts. In the event any Delinquent Amount is
inadvertently omitted from such schedule, Seller shall not be deemed to have
waived its rights to such Delinquent Amount;
 
4.4.3 the amount of
unapplied refundable security deposits held by Seller under the Leases;
 
4.4.4 water, electric,
telephone and all other utility and fuel charges, fuel on hand (at cost plus
sales tax); provided, however, that any deposits with utility companies shall
remain the property of the Seller and shall not be prorated or credited (to the
extent possible, utility prorations will be handled by meter readings on the
day immediately preceding the Closing Date);
 
4.4.5 amounts due and
payable by Seller under the Service Contracts but excluding any lump sum or up
front payments paid to Seller with respect thereto;
 
4.4.6 assignable license and
permit fees;
 
4.4.7 other similar items of
income and expenses of operation; and
 
4.4.8 with respect to Leases
for commercial or retail space, additional rent in the amount currently being
collected by Seller under the Leases to cover taxes, insurance, utilities,
maintenance and other operating costs and expenses (collectively, “Operating Expense
Pass-throughs”) incurred by Seller in connection with the ownership,
operation, maintenance and management of the Property. If Seller collected
estimated prepayments of Operating Expense Pass-throughs in excess of any
tenant’s share of such expenses, then if the excess can be determined by the
Closing, Purchaser shall receive a credit for the excess or, if the excess
cannot be determined at Closing, Purchaser shall receive a credit based upon an
estimate, and the parties shall make an adjusting payment between them when the
correct amount can be determined. In either event, Purchaser shall be
responsible for crediting or repaying those amounts to the appropriate tenants.
If Seller collected estimated prepayments of Operating Expense Pass-throughs
 
8




 
attributable to any period after Closing, Seller
shall pay or credit any such amounts to Purchaser at Closing.
 
Except with respect to Taxes
(which shall be paid as specified in Section 4.4.1 above), any proration
which must be estimated at Closing shall be reprorated and finally adjusted as
soon as practicable after the Closing Date; otherwise, subject to the
provisions of Section 4.4.2 above, all prorations shall be final. In
addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this
Section 4, Seller reserves the right (i) to meet with governmental
officials and to contest any reassessment governing or affecting Seller’s
obligations under Section 4.4.1 above, and (ii) to contest any
assessment of the Property or any portion thereof and to attempt to obtain a
refund for any taxes previously paid. Seller shall retain all rights with
respect to any refund of taxes applicable to any period prior to the Closing
Date. The obligations of Purchaser and Seller under Section 4.4 of this
Agreement shall survive the Closing.
 
4.5                                 Transaction Costs. Seller shall
pay for any base premium due in connection with the Owner’s Policy (the “Base Premium”) which shall be net of any reissue discount
which may be available from Title Insurer in connection with the delivery of an
existing owner’s policy of title insurance, and one-half (1/2) of Escrowee’s
standard escrow fees. All other closing and transaction costs (including,
without limitation, title insurance premiums or other title costs in excess of
the Base Premium (including, without limitation, premiums for any endorsements
to the Owner’s Policy, premiums for any loan policy or endorsements thereto
required by Purchaser’s lender, if any), transfer taxes, documentary stamps or
similar charges, recording charges, any costs relating to the Updated Survey
and one-half (1/2) of Escrowee’s standard escrow fees) shall be paid by
Purchaser. Notwithstanding Purchaser’s obligation to pay all state, county, and
municipal real estate transfer taxes, Seller shall contribute a total of
$200,000.00 toward Purchaser’s payment of state, county, and municipal real
estate transfer taxes by providing Purchaser with a credit therefor on the
closing statement described in Section 4.2.8 above. Subject to
Section 14.19, Seller and Purchaser shall, however, be responsible for the
fees of their respective attorneys. This Section 4.5 shall survive any
termination of this Agreement.
 
4.6                                 Possession. Upon Closing,
Seller shall deliver to Purchaser possession of the Property, subject to such
matters as are permitted by or pursuant to this Agreement.
 
5.                                       CASUALTY LOSS
AND CONDEMNATION. Prior to closing, the risk of loss shall remain
with Seller. If, prior to Closing, the Property or any part thereof shall be
condemned, or destroyed or damaged by fire or other casualty, Seller shall
promptly so notify Purchaser. If the Property or any part thereof shall be
condemned such that damages are in excess of Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand and
No/100ths Dollars ($750,000.00), (as determined by an MAI certified appraiser
selected by Seller) or if the Property or any part thereof shall be destroyed
or damaged by fire or other casualty the repair of which would cost in excess
of Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand and No/100ths Dollars ($750,000.00) (as
determined by the insurance adjuster designated by Seller’s insurance company),
then, at the option of Purchaser, which option shall be exercisable, if at all,
by written notice thereof to Seller within ten (10) business days after
the date that Purchaser has received both written notice of such fire,
earthquake or other casualty or condemnation and the insurance adjuster’s
determination of resulting damages,
 
9




 
this Agreement may be terminated. If Purchaser so elects to terminate
this Agreement, the Earnest Money (specifically excluding the Option Fee, which
shall be paid to Seller) shall be returned to Purchaser by Escrowee, in which
event this Agreement shall, without further action of the parties, become null
and void and neither party shall have any rights or obligations under this
Agreement, except those which expressly survive termination. In the event that
Purchaser does not exercise the option to terminate the Agreement set forth
above, or if the condemnation or casualty is below the $750,000 threshold
described above, then, subject to the provisions of this Agreement, the Closing
shall take place on the Closing Date and Purchaser shall be entitled to
receive: (a) with respect to a condemnation, an assignment of all of
Seller’s right, title and interest in and to the condemnation proceeds to be
awarded to Seller as a result of such condemnation, and (b) with respect
to a casualty, assignment of Seller’s interest in any then unpaid insurance
proceeds claimed with respect to the loss which is the subject of the casualty
and a payment from Seller of all insurance proceeds theretofore paid to Seller
with respect to same and not used for restoration or repair (provided, however,
Purchaser shall have the right to approve, in its reasonable discretion, any
such restoration or repair and the amounts expended in connection therewith by
Seller except to the extent that any such restoration or repair, in the
Seller’s reasonable judgment, is necessary to comply with applicable laws,
rules, regulations or ordinances or to avoid imminent danger to persons or
property) plus a credit against the Purchase Price equal to the deductibles
under Seller’s respective insurance policies. In addition, in the event of the
foregoing, Purchaser shall deliver to Seller at Closing a release in form and
substance reasonably satisfactory to Seller and Purchaser whereby Purchaser
releases Seller from all ongoing liability and/or claims in connection with
such condemnation or casualty.
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this
Section 5, in the event any condemnation below the $750,000 threshold
described above either (i) prohibits, as a matter of applicable law, the
rebuilding or repair of the Improvements substantially as they currently exist
or (ii) prevents access to the Property from a publicly dedicated street,
then Purchaser may elect to terminate this Agreement by written notice thereof
to Seller within ten (10) business days of such determination, and upon
the exercise of such option by Purchaser, this Agreement shall become null and
void, the Earnest Money (specifically excluding the Option Fee, which shall be
paid to Seller) shall be returned to Purchaser and neither party shall have any
further liability or obligations hereunder, except those that expressly survive
termination.
 
If and to the extent that Seller is required in this Section 5 to
assign and transfer to Purchaser any of Seller’s right, title and interest in
and to insurance proceeds, Seller shall cooperate with Purchaser’s efforts, in
all reasonable respects, to cause Seller’s insurance carriers to pay any unpaid
insurance proceeds to Purchaser and for Purchaser’s benefit.
 
6.                                       BROKERAGE. Seller agrees
to pay upon Closing (but not otherwise) a brokerage commission due to CB
Richard Ellis, Inc. pursuant to a separate agreement for services rendered
in connection with the sale and purchase of the Property. Seller and Purchaser
shall each indemnify and hold the other harmless from and against any and all
claims of all other brokers and finders claiming by, through or under the
indemnifying party and in any way related to the sale and purchase of the
Property, this Agreement or otherwise, including, without limitation,
attorneys’ fees and expenses incurred by the indemnified party in connection
with such claim. This Section 6 shall survive the termination of this
Agreement.
 
10



 
7.                                       DEFAULT AND
REMEDIES.
 
7.1                                 Purchaser’s Pre-Closing
Remedies. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained
in this Agreement, if Seller fails to perform in accordance with the terms of
this Agreement at or prior to Closing, and such failure continues for five
(5) days following notice thereof from Purchaser to Seller (provided,
however, that Seller shall not be entitled to any such notice or cure period
for any default under Sections 4 or 14.9), and Purchaser is not in material
default hereunder, then, as Purchaser’s sole and exclusive remedy hereunder and
at Purchaser’s option, either (i) the Earnest Money (including the Option
Fee) shall be returned to Purchaser, in which event this Agreement shall be
null and void, and neither party shall have any rights or obligations under
this Agreement except those which expressly survive termination and except that
Seller shall reimburse Purchaser for all actual, reasonable out-of-pocket
expenses (including, without limitation, reasonable out-of-pocket attorneys’
fees, engineering fees, consultants’ fees, and environmental consultant fees)
paid by Purchaser in connection with its due diligence, inspection and
negotiation of the possible acquisition of the Property, in an amount not to
exceed $25,000 in the aggregate (provided Purchaser promptly provides written
evidence of such expenses to Seller) , or (ii) upon notice to Seller not
more than ten (10) days after Purchaser becomes aware of such failure, and
provided an action is filed within forty-five (45) days thereafter, Purchaser
may seek specific performance of this Agreement, but not damages. Purchaser’s
failure to seek specific performance as aforesaid shall constitute its election
to proceed under clause (i) above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing
in this Section 7.1 shall limit the indemnification obligation of Seller
under Section 6 of this Agreement.
 
7.2                                 Seller’s Pre-Closing
Remedies. If Purchaser fails to perform in accordance with
the terms of this Agreement, and such failure continues for five (5) days
following notice thereof from Seller to Purchaser (provided, however, that
Purchaser shall not be entitled to any such notice or cure period for any
default under Sections 4 or 14.9), and Seller is not in material default
hereunder, Seller shall have the right to terminate this Agreement by
delivering written notice to Purchaser whereupon the Earnest Money shall be
forfeited to Seller as liquidated damages (which shall be Seller’s sole and
exclusive remedy against Purchaser), it being agreed between the parties hereto
that the actual damages to Seller in such event are impractical to ascertain
and the amount of the Earnest Money is a reasonable estimate thereof and shall
be and constitute valid liquidated damages, at which time this Agreement shall
be null and void and neither party shall have any rights or obligations under
this Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this Section 7.2
shall limit any indemnification obligation of Purchaser under this Agreement.
 
7.3                                 Pre-Closing Knowledge. If at any
time after the execution of this Agreement, either Purchaser or Seller becomes
aware of any fact or information which makes a representation and warranty of
Seller contained in this Agreement to become untrue “in any material respect”
(defined below), said party shall promptly disclose such fact in writing to the
other party hereto. If Seller has not taken a willful act which is unpermitted
under this Agreement to cause the representation to become untrue, Seller shall
not be in default under this Agreement and the sole remedy of Purchaser shall
be to either (i) terminate this Agreement by written notice within five
(5) business days of the date on which Purchaser becomes aware of such
fact (“Notice Date”), in which event the
Earnest Money (excluding the Option Fee, which
 
11




 
shall be paid to Seller) shall be returned to Purchaser, and this
Agreement, without further action of the parties, shall become null and void
such that neither party shall have any further rights or obligations under this
Agreement except for those rights and obligations which by their terms
expressly survive any such termination, or (ii) subject to the provisions
of this Agreement, elect to proceed to Closing, in which case Purchaser shall
be deemed to have waived its rights with respect to any such breach of
representation or warranty. In the event that Purchaser fails to deliver such
termination notice to Seller on or before the Notice Date, then Purchaser shall
conclusively deemed to have elected to proceed under clause (ii) of the
preceding sentence. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this
Agreement and without limitation to anything in Section 10.6 below,
Purchaser is prohibited from making any claims against Seller after the Closing
with respect to any breaches of Seller’s representations and warranties
contained in this Agreement that Purchaser has actual knowledge of prior to the
Closing. Notwithstanding clause (i) above in this Section 7.3, in the
event the representation and warranty in Section 10.1.5 below (concerning
condemnation) is true on the Effective Date and thereafter becomes untrue and
Purchaser does not have the right to terminate this Agreement under
Section 5 above, then Purchaser shall not have the right to terminate the
Agreement under this Section 7.3 (however, Purchaser shall have the rights
provided under Section 5 above). For purposes of this Section 7.3,
the term “in any material respect” shall mean
that any inaccuracy in such matter (together with all other breaches of
representations and warranties set forth in this Agreement, if any) will have
an adverse monetary effect on the Property which exceeds Two Hundred Fifty
Thousand and 00/100 Dollars ($250,000). For purposes of this Section 7.3,
Purchaser’s “knowledge”, “actual knowledge”, or words of similar import, shall
be deemed to be the collective knowledge of Mark T. Alfieri, Robert T. Poynter,
and Jon Bader, each of whom shall be deemed to have actual knowledge of the
employees and consultants of Purchaser and/or its affiliates that have
conducted any due diligence investigations on behalf of Purchaser and/or its
affiliates with respect to the Property, and all matters disclosed by the
Disclosures (hereinafter defined), and any other documentation of Seller which
was delivered to, or made available for review by, Purchaser. Notwithstanding
anything to the contrary set forth in this Agreement, none of Mark T. Alfieri,
Robert T. Poynter or Jon Bader shall have any personal liability or liability
whatsoever with respect to any matters set forth in this Agreement or the
transactions contemplated hereby.
 
7.4                                 Post-Closing Remedies. From and
after the Closing, Seller and Purchaser shall, subject to the terms and
conditions of this Agreement including, without limitation, the terms of
Section 12.1 below, have such rights and remedies as are available at law
or in equity, except that neither Seller nor Purchaser shall be entitled to
recover from the other consequential or special damages.
 
8.                                       CONDITIONS
PRECEDENT.
 
8.1                                 Condition Precedent -
Purchaser.
 
8.1.1 Purchaser shall have
until 5:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on the twenty-fifth (25th) day after the
Effective Date within which to inspect the Property (the “Review
Period”). If Purchaser determines that the Property is unsuitable
for its purposes and so notifies Seller in writing within the Review Period,
the Earnest Money (specifically excluding the Option Fee, which shall
 
12




 
be paid to Seller) shall be returned to Purchaser,
at which time this Agreement shall be null and void and neither party shall
have any further rights or obligations under this Agreement except those which
expressly survive termination. Purchaser’s failure to terminate this Agreement
within the Review Period shall be conclusively deemed a waiver by Purchaser of
the condition contained in this Section 8.1.1.
 
8.1.2 Purchaser’s right of
inspection pursuant to this Section 8 shall be subject to the rights of
tenants under the Leases and other occupants and users of the Property. Before
entering upon the Property, Purchaser shall furnish to Seller a certificate of
insurance evidencing: (a) commercial general liability insurance coverage
of not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) per occurrence and Two
Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) in the aggregate, (b) commercial
automobile insurance coverage of not less than One Million Dollars
($1,000,000.00) per occurrence which shall cover liability arising in
connection with any automobile at the Property (including owned, hired and
non-owned automobiles), and (iii) workers’ compensation insurance as
required by statute in the state where the Property is located and employer’s
liability insurance of not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) per
accident. All of the foregoing amounts may be met in combination with an
umbrella or excess liability policy. With respect to the coverages required by
subsections (a) and (b) immediately preceding, Seller, Stark and Roth, Inc.,
and their agents and affiliates shall be named as additional insureds. Such
insurance coverage shall (i) be issued by an insurance company licensed to
do business in the state where the Property is located having a rating of at
least “AX” by A.M. Best Company, (ii) be primary and any insurance
maintained by Seller shall be excess and noncontributory, (iii) include
contractual liability coverage with respect to Purchaser’s indemnity
obligations set forth in this Agreement (it being understood, however, that the
availability of such insurance shall not serve to limit or define the scope of
Purchaser’s indemnity obligations under this Agreement in any manner
whatsoever), and (iv) not contain any exclusions for work performed at or
on residential properties, or for “insured versus insured” claims as respects
any potential claim by Seller against Purchaser. The insurance certificate
required herein shall also provide that the coverage may not be cancelled,
non-renewed or reduced without at least thirty (30) days’ prior written notice
to Seller. No inspection shall be undertaken on less than twenty-four (24)
hours prior written notice to Seller. Seller shall have the right to be present
at any or all inspections. Without limiting Purchaser’s right to seek a Zoning 3.1
Endorsement to the Owner’s Policy, neither Purchaser nor its agents or
representatives shall contact any tenants or any governmental or
quasi-governmental entities concerning the Property or Seller without the prior
written consent of Seller and without Seller being entitled to participate in
such discussions. No inspection shall involve the taking of samples or other
physically invasive procedures without the prior written consent of Seller in
its reasonable discretion. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained
in this Agreement, Purchaser shall indemnify, defend (with counsel
 
13




 
acceptable to Seller) and hold Seller, Stark and
Roth, Inc. and each of their respective past, present and future affiliates
(collectively, “Seller’s Affiliates”), harmless
from and against any and all losses, claims, damages and liabilities
(including, without limitation, attorneys’ fees and costs incurred in
connection therewith) arising out of or resulting from Purchaser’s exercise of
its rights under Section 8 of this Agreement; provided, however, Purchaser
shall not be liable for, and Purchaser shall not indemnify Seller or Seller’s
Affiliates with respect to, any pre-existing condition, fact, matter, item or
substance discovered, uncovered, located, or identified as a result of the
entry or activities of Purchaser which are expressly permitted hereunder,
except to the extent that such condition, fact, matter, item or substance is
exacerbated by Purchaser or its consultant’s inspection. Purchaser shall
restore to its original condition the Property or any portion thereof or any of
Personal Property that is damaged or modified by Purchaser’s inspections or
testing. The indemnification obligation of Purchaser in this Section 8.1.2
shall survive termination of this Agreement.
 
8.1.3 At Closing, all
management contracts relating to the Property shall be terminated.
 
9.                                  SECTION 1031
EXCHANGE. Seller may structure the disposition of the
Property as a like-kind exchange under Internal Revenue Code Section 1031
at Seller’s sole cost and expense. Purchaser shall reasonably cooperate
therein, provided that Purchaser shall incur no material costs, expenses or
liabilities in connection with Seller’s exchange, and the Closing shall not be
delayed as a result thereof. Seller shall indemnify, defend and hold Purchaser
harmless therefrom and Purchaser shall not be required to take title to or
contract for purchase of any other property. If Seller uses a qualified
intermediary to effectuate the exchange, any assignment of the rights or
obligations of Seller hereunder shall not relieve, release or absolve Seller of
its obligations to Purchaser.
 
10.                            REPRESENTATIONS AND
WARRANTIES.
 
10.1                            Seller’s Representations
and Warranties. Seller represents and warrants to Purchaser as of the
Effective Date as follows:
 
10.1.1 Seller is a limited
liability company, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under
the laws of the State of Wisconsin.
 
10.1.2 Seller has full
power, right and authority to enter into and perform its obligations under this
Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by Seller
have been duly and properly authorized by proper company action in accordance
with applicable law and with the Articles of Organization of Seller.
 
10.1.3 To Seller’s
knowledge, Exhibit C attached hereto lists all of the Service
Contracts entered into by Seller that affect the Property and the service
provider under each Service Contract. Notwithstanding anything
 
14




 
in this Agreement to the contrary, Seller does not
covenant or represent that any particular Service Contract will be assignable
to Purchaser at Closing, will be in force or effect as of the Closing, or that
the parties to the Service Contracts will not be in default under their
respective Service Contracts, and the existence of any default by any party
under any Service Contract shall not affect the obligations of Purchaser
hereunder.
 
10.1.4 To Seller’s knowledge,
Exhibit L attached hereto describes, in all material respects, the
following information concerning the Leases affecting the Property as of the
date thereon (“Rent Roll”): (a) unit number,
(b) name of tenant, (c) rental rate, (d) move in date,
(e) expiration date, and (f) amount of security deposit, and, to
Seller’s knowledge, the Rent Roll is true, correct and complete in all material
respects. Seller makes no representation with respect to any information
provided in Exhibit L that is not described in the preceding
sentence. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, Seller
does not covenant or represent that tenants under Leases will not be in default
under their respective Leases, and the existence of any default by any tenant
under its Lease shall not affect the obligations of Purchaser hereunder.
 
10.1.5 Seller has not
received from any governmental authority having the power of eminent domain any
written notice of any condemnation of the Property or any part thereof.
 
10.1.6 To Seller’s
knowledge, except as set forth on Exhibit N attached hereto, Seller
does not have any knowledge of any material defects affecting the Property (for
the purposes of this Section 10.1.6, material defects shall mean a defect
that, in the aggregate, adversely affect the value of the Property by more than
$250,000.00).
 
10.1.7 Except as set forth
on Exhibit O attached hereto, Seller has received no written notice
of any pending litigation initiated against Seller or the Property which would
materially affect the Property after Closing.
 
10.1.8 To Seller’s
knowledge, except as set forth on Exhibit P attached hereto, Seller
has not received from any governmental authority written notice of any material
violation of any building, fire or health code or any other statute applicable
to the Property which will not be cured prior to Closing.
 
10.1.9 Seller has not
received any currently effective written notice that any Hazardous Substances
(as hereinafter defined) exist at the Property in violation of Applicable Environmental
Laws. As used in this Agreement, the term “Applicable Environmental Laws” means
the following laws as amended from time to time: (A) the Resource
Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 USC §1801, et. seq.; or (B) the
Comprehensive
 
15




 
Environmental Response Compensation and Liability
Act of 1980, 42 USC §9601 et. seq.
 
10.2                            Seller’s Knowledge.
When used in this Agreement, the term “to Seller’s knowledge”, “Seller does not
have any knowledge of “ or words of similar import shall mean and be limited to
the actual (and not imputed, implied or constructive) current knowledge,
without inquiry, of Anthony Marino, Senior Corporate Counsel of Stark
Investments. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this
Agreement, Anthony Marino shall not have any personal liability or liability
whatsoever with respect to any matters set forth in this Agreement or any of
Seller’s representations and/or warranties herein being or becoming untrue,
inaccurate or incomplete.
 
10.3                            Survival of Seller’s
Representations and Warranties. Subject to the provisions of
Section 7.3, Section 10.6 and any actions or conduct of Seller
permitted under this Agreement, the representations and warranties of Seller
set forth in Section 10.1 shall be updated by Seller at Closing in
accordance with Section 4.2.9 above, and shall survive the Closing and the
delivery of the Deed for a period of six (6) months following the Closing
Date (provided, however, that Seller’s representations and warranties set forth
in Sections 10.1.1 and 10.1.2 above shall survive Closing and the delivery of
the Deed for the longest period permitted by law). Except with respect to
Seller’s representations and warranties set forth in Section 10.1.1 and 10.1.2
above, notice of any claim as to a breach of any representation or warranty
must be made to Seller prior to the expiration of such six (6) month
period or it shall be deemed a waiver of Purchaser’s right to assert such
claim.
 
10.4                            Purchaser’s Representations
and Warranties. Purchaser represents and warrants to Seller as of the
Effective Date as follows:
 
10.4.1 Purchaser is a
limited partnership, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing
under the laws of the State of Delaware.
 
10.4.2 Purchaser has full
power, right and authority to enter into, and as of the Closing Date will have
the full power, right and authority to perform its obligations under, this
Agreement. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement by
Purchaser have been duly and properly authorized by proper corporate action in
accordance with applicable law and with the organizational documents of
Purchaser.
 
10.4.3 Neither Purchaser
nor, to Purchaser’s knowledge, any other person or party that directly or
indirectly owns a five percent (5%) or greater ownership interest in Purchaser
is (a) identified on the OFAC List (as hereinafter defined) or (b) a
person with whom a citizen of the United States is prohibited to engage in
transactions by any trade embargo, economic sanction, or other prohibition of
United States law, rule, regulation or Executive Order of the President of the
United States. The term “OFAC List”
shall mean the list of specially designated nationals and blocked persons
subject to financial sanctions that is maintained by the U.S. Treasury
Department, Office of Foreign Assets Control and any other similar list
maintained by the U.S.
 
16




 
Treasury Department, Office of Foreign Assets
Control pursuant to any law, rule, regulation or Executive Order of the
President of the United States, including, without limitation, trade embargo,
economic sanctions, or other prohibitions imposed by Executive Order of the
President of the United States.
 
10.4.4 Purchaser is not a
party in interest under Section 3(14) of the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974 (“ERISA”), or a
disqualified person under Section 4975(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended (the “Code”).
 
10.4.5 Purchaser’s acquisition
of the Property will not constitute or result in a prohibited transaction under
Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code.
 
10.4.6 Purchaser is not an
entity whose assets are deemed to be “plan assets” under ERISA, and the funds
being used by Purchaser to acquire the Property do not constitute in full or in
part “plan assets” subject to ERISA (as defined in 29 C.F.R. § 2510.3-101).
 
10.5                            Survival of Purchaser’s
Representations and Warranties. The representations and warranties of
Purchaser set forth in Section 10.4 shall be deemed to be remade by
Purchaser as of Closing and shall survive the Closing and delivery of the Deed
for the longest period permitted by law.
 
10.6                            Modification of
Representations, Warranties and/or Certifications. Prior to Closing, as and
to the extent that(i) Purchaser obtains actual knowledge of facts, or
(ii) Purchaser receives (or Seller receives and delivers to Purchaser) any
Disclosures (as hereinafter defined) with respect to matters addressed in
Section 10.1, which contain information or facts that are inconsistent
with or different from any or all of the representations, warranties or
certifications made in Section 10.1 above, and the Closing occurs, then
such inconsistent portion of such representation, warranty or certification
made in this Section 10 shall be deemed to be modified and superseded by
such fact or Disclosure (and, in such event, Seller shall no longer have any
liability hereunder with respect to that portion of the representation,
warranty or certification superseded herein, as applicable).
 
11.                                 AS-IS.
 
11.1                         AS-IS
CONDITION.  SUBJECT TO SELLER’S REPRESENTATIONS AND
WARRANTIES EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN SECTION 10.1 ABOVE AND IN ANY DOCUMENTS
DELIVERED PURSUANT TO THE TERMS HEREOF BY SELLER TO PURCHASER AT CLOSING, AND
ACKNOWLEDGING THE PRIOR USE OF THE PROPERTY AND PURCHASER’S OPPORTUNITY TO
INSPECT THE PROPERTY, PURCHASER AGREES TO PURCHASE THE PROPERTY “AS IS”, “WHERE
IS”, WITH ALL FAULTS AND CONDITIONS THEREON. ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL INFORMATION,
REPORTS, STATEMENTS, DOCUMENTS OR RECORDS CONCERNING THE PROPERTY
(“DISCLOSURES”) PROVIDED OR MADE AVAILABLE TO PURCHASER, ITS AGENTS OR
 
17




 
CONSTITUENTS BY SELLER, SELLER’S AGENTS, EMPLOYEES OR THIRD PARTIES
REPRESENTING OR PURPORTING TO REPRESENT SELLER, SHALL NOT BE REPRESENTATIONS OR
WARRANTIES, UNLESS SPECIFICALLY SET FORTH IN SECTION 10.1 OF THIS
AGREEMENT. IN PURCHASING THE PROPERTY OR TAKING OTHER ACTION HEREUNDER,
PURCHASER HAS NOT AND SHALL NOT RELY ON ANY SUCH DISCLOSURES, BUT RATHER,
PURCHASER SHALL RELY ONLY ON PURCHASER’S OWN INSPECTION OF THE PROPERTY.
PURCHASER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE PURCHASE PRICE REFLECTS AND TAKES INTO ACCOUNT
THAT THE PROPERTY IS BEING SOLD “AS IS”.
 
11.2                            NO
ADDITIONAL REPRESENTATIONS.  PURCHASER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES
THAT EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN SECTION 10.1 OF THIS AGREEMENT AND
IN ANY DOCUMENTS DELIVERED PURSUANT TO THE TERMS HEREOF BY SELLER TO PURCHASER
AT CLOSING, SELLER HAS NOT MADE, DOES NOT MAKE AND SPECIFICALLY DISCLAIMS ANY
REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, PROMISES, COVENANTS, AGREEMENTS OR GUARANTIES OF
ANY KIND OR CHARACTER WHATSOEVER, WHETHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ORAL OR WRITTEN,
PAST, PRESENT OR FUTURE, OF, AS TO, CONCERNING OR WITH RESPECT TO THE PROPERTY
INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, (A) THE NATURE, QUALITY OR PHYSICAL
CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY, (B) THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE IMPROVEMENTS AND
WHETHER THERE EXISTS ANY CONSTRUCTION DEFECTS THEREIN, (C) THE WATER, SOIL
AND GEOLOGY OF THE PROPERTY, (D) THE INCOME TO BE DERIVED FROM THE
PROPERTY, (E) THE SUITABILITY OF THE PROPERTY FOR ANY AND ALL ACTIVITIES
AND USES WHICH PURCHASER MAY CONDUCT THEREON, (F) THE COMPLIANCE OF
OR BY THE PROPERTY OR THE OPERATION THEREOF WITH ANY LAWS, RULES, ORDINANCES OR
REGULATIONS OF ANY GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY OR BODY HAVING JURISDICTION
THEREOVER, (G) THE HABITABILITY OR FITNESS OF THE PROPERTY FOR A
PARTICULAR PURPOSE, (H) THE MARKETABILITY OF THE PROPERTY OR THE ABILITY
TO LEASE OR SELL UNITS THEREIN, (I) THE STATUS OR CONDITION OF ENTITLEMENTS
PERTAINING TO THE PROPERTY, AND (J) ANY MATTER REGARDING TERMITES OR
WASTES, AS DEFINED BY THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY REGULATIONS AT
40 C.F.R., OR ANY HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, AS HEREINAFTER DEFINED. PURCHASER
FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT SELLER, UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY
LAW, IS UNDER NO DUTY TO MAKE ANY AFFIRMATIVE DISCLOSURES REGARDING ANY
MATTER WHICH MAY BE KNOWN TO SELLER.
 
11.3                            RELEASE.
PURCHASER REPRESENTS TO SELLER THAT PURCHASER HAS CONDUCTED, OR WILL CONDUCT
PRIOR TO CLOSING, SUCH INVESTIGATIONS OF THE PROPERTY, AS PURCHASER DEEMS
NECESSARY OR DESIRABLE TO SATISFY ITSELF AS TO ANY MATTER RELATING TO THE
PROPERTY AND WILL RELY SOLELY UPON SAME AND NOT UPON ANY
 
18




 
INFORMATION PROVIDED BY OR ON BEHALF OF SELLER, SELLER’S AGENTS,
EMPLOYEES OR THIRD PARTIES REPRESENTING OR PURPORTING TO REPRESENT SELLER, WITH
RESPECT THERETO. UPON CLOSING, PURCHASER SHALL ASSUME THE RISK THAT ADVERSE
MATTERS REGARDING THE PROPERTY MAY NOT HAVE BEEN REVEALED BY PURCHASER’S
INVESTIGATIONS, AND PURCHASER, UPON CLOSING, SHALL BE DEEMED, ON BEHALF OF
ITSELF AND ON BEHALF OF ITS TRANSFEREES AND THEIR RESPECTIVE SUCCESSORS AND
ASSIGNS, TO WAIVE, RELINQUISH, RELEASE AND FOREVER DISCHARGE SELLER AND
SELLER’S AFFILIATES FROM AND AGAINST ANY AND ALL CLAIMS, DEMANDS, CAUSES OF
ACTION, LOSSES, DAMAGES, LIABILITIES, COSTS AND EXPENSES (INCLUDING ATTORNEYS’
FEES) OF ANY AND EVERY KIND OR CHARACTER, KNOWN OR UNKNOWN, BY REASON OF
OR ARISING OUT OF THE PROPERTY, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, BY REASON
OF OR ARISING OUT OF ANY LATENT OR PATENT CONSTRUCTION DEFECT OR OTHER PHYSICAL
CONDITION (INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, FUNGI, MOLD OR MILDEW) WHETHER
PURSUANT TO STATUTES IN EFFECT IN THE STATE OF ILLINOIS OR ANY OTHER FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL ENVIRONMENTAL OR HEALTH AND SAFETY LAW OR REGULATION, THE
EXISTENCE OF ANY HAZARDOUS MATERIAL WHATSOEVER, ON, AT, TO, IN, ABOVE,
ABOUT, UNDER, FROM OR IN THE VICINITY OF THE PROPERTY AND ANY AND ALL OTHER
ACTS, OMISSIONS, EVENTS, CIRCUMSTANCES OR MATTERS WHATSOEVER REGARDING THE
PROPERTY. THIS RELEASE INCLUDES CLAIMS OF WHICH PURCHASER IS PRESENTLY UNAWARE
AND OF WHICH PURCHASER DOES NOT PRESENTLY SUSPECT TO EXIST WHICH, IF KNOWN
BY PURCHASER, WOULD MATERIALLY AFFECT PURCHASER’S RELEASE OF SELLER.
 
IN THIS REGARD AND TO THE
EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, PURCHASER HEREBY AGREES, REPRESENTS AND WARRANTS THAT
PURCHASER REALIZES AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT FACTUAL MATTERS NOW UNKNOWN TO
PURCHASER MAY HAVE GIVEN OR MAY HEREAFTER GIVE RISE TO CAUSES OF
ACTION, CLAIMS, DEMANDS, DEBTS, CONTROVERSIES, DAMAGES, COSTS, LOSSES AND
EXPENSES WHICH ARE PRESENTLY UNKNOWN, UNANTICIPATED AND UNSUSPECTED, AND
PURCHASER FURTHER AGREES, REPRESENTS AND WARRANTS THAT THE WAIVERS AND RELEASES
CONTAINED HEREIN HAVE BEEN NEGOTIATED AND AGREED UPON BY PURCHASER IN LIGHT OF
THAT REALIZATION AND THAT PURCHASER NEVERTHELESS HEREBY INTENDS TO RELEASE,
DISCHARGE AND ACQUIT SELLER AND SELLER’S AFFILIATES FROM ANY SUCH UNKNOWN
CAUSES OF ACTION, CLAIMS, DEMANDS, DEBTS, CONTROVERSIES, DAMAGES, COSTS, LOSSES
AND EXPENSES.
 
NOTWITHSTANDING THE
FOREGOING PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION 11.3, PURCHASER’S RELEASE OF SELLER
AS SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION 11.3 SHALL NOT PERTAIN TO ANY CLAIM OR CAUSE
OF ACTION BY PURCHASER AGAINST SELLER FOR A BREACH BY SELLER OF A
REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN SECTION 10.1 OF THIS
AGREEMENT
 
19




 
OR IN ANY DOCUMENTS DELIVERED
PURSUANT TO THE TERMS HEREOF BY SELLER TO PURCHASER AT CLOSING.
 
“Hazardous Materials” or “Hazardous Substances” - shall mean
(i) hazardous wastes, hazardous materials, hazardous substances, hazardous
constituents, toxic substances or related materials, whether solids, liquids or
gases, including, but not limited to, substances defined as “hazardous wastes,”
“hazardous materials,” “hazardous substances,” “toxic substances,”
“pollutants,” “contaminants,” “radioactive materials”, “toxic pollutants”, or
other similar designations in, or otherwise subject to regulation under, the
Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980,
as amended (“CERCLA”), 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et
seq.;  the Toxic Substance Control
Act (“TSCA”), 15 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.; the Hazardous Materials
Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. §5101 et seq.; the Resource Conservation
and Recovery Act (“RCRA”), 42
U.S.C. § 9601, et seq.; the Clean Water Act (“CWA”),
33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.; the Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et
seq.; the Clean Air Act (“CAA”), 42
U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.; and in any permits, licenses, approvals, plans,
rules, regulations or ordinances adopted, or other criteria and guidelines
promulgated pursuant to the preceding laws or other similar federal, state or
local laws, regulations, rules or ordinance now or hereafter in effect
relating to environmental matters; and (ii) any other substances,
constituents or wastes subject to any applicable federal, state or local law,
regulation or ordinance, including any environmental law, now or hereafter in
effect, including but not limited to (A) petroleum, (B) refined
petroleum products, (C) waste oil, (D) waste aviation
or motor vehicle fuel and their byproducts, (E) asbestos, (F) lead
in water, paint or elsewhere, (G) radon, (H) Polychlorinated
Biphenyls (PCB’s), (I) ureaformaldehyde, (J) volatile
organic compounds (VOC), (K) total petroleum hydrocarbons (TPH), (L) benzine
derivative (BTEX), and (M) petroleum byproducts.
 
11.4                            Condominium Conversions.
Purchaser agrees to indemnify, defend and hold Seller, Seller’s Affiliates, and
each of their respective members, partners, officers, directors, trustees,
parents, subsidiaries, shareholders, managers, beneficiaries, employees and
agents, harmless from and against any and all demands, claims, causes of
action, legal or administrative proceedings, losses, liabilities, damages,
penalties, fines, liens, judgments, costs or expenses whatsoever and of any
kind or nature (including, without limitation, court costs and reasonable
attorneys’ fees arising out of any of the above), whether in tort, contract or
otherwise, and whether arising under statutes in effect in the State of
Illinois or otherwise, arising out of or directly relating to claims made or
brought by or on behalf of any party or parties who acquire or contract to acquire
any ownership interest in the Property following the filing or recording of any
document providing for the conversion of the Property to a form of condominium
ownership under any state or local law (including, without limitation,
condominium and homeowner associations), and their successors and assigns, in
connection with or related to, the physical condition of the Property prior to,
at and subsequent to Closing, including, without limitation, with respect to
deficiencies (including, without limitation, any latent or patent defect) in
the design, specification, surveying, planning, development, supervision or
construction of an improvement to the Property, or any injury arising out of
any such deficiency, all structural and seismic elements of the Property, all
mechanical, electrical, plumbing, sewage, heating, ventilating, air
conditioning and other systems, the existence of asbestos, mold, mildew or
fungi and the environmental condition of the Property. The provisions of this
Section 11 shall survive the Closing for the longest period permitted by
law. Purchaser and Seller acknowledge and agree that the disclaimers,
indemnifications and other agreements set forth herein are an integral
 
20




 
part of this Agreement and that Seller would not have agreed to sell
the Property to Purchaser for the Purchase Price and Purchaser would not have
agreed to enter into the transaction contemplated by this Agreement without
such disclaimers, indemnifications and other agreements set forth above.
 
12.                            LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
 
12.1                            Limitation of Liability.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, if the Closing shall
have occurred (and Purchaser shall not have waived, relinquished or released
any applicable rights in further limitation), the aggregate liability of Seller
arising pursuant to or in connection with the representations, warranties,
indemnifications, covenants or other obligations (whether express or implied)
of Seller under this Agreement (or any document executed or delivered in
connection herewith) shall not exceed Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand and
No/100ths Dollars ($750,000.00). Seller shall not be liable to Purchaser in
respect of the representations, warranties, indemnifications, covenants or
other obligations (whether express or implied) of Seller under this Agreement
(or any document executed or delivered in connection herewith) unless and until
the sum of such obligations exceeds Twenty Five Thousand and no/100ths Dollars
($25,000.00) in the aggregate. The provisions of this Section 12.1 shall
survive the closing or any termination of this Agreement.
 
12.2                            No Personal Liability of
Seller’s Members and Employees. No constituent member of Seller or any of
Seller’s or such member’s agents, partners, members, advisors, trustees,
directors, officers, employees, beneficiaries, shareholders, participants, or
agents of (including, but not limited to, Stark and Roth, Inc.) shall have
any personal liability, directly or indirectly, under or in connection with
this Agreement or any agreement made or entered into under or pursuant to the
provisions of this Agreement, or any amendment or amendments to any of the
foregoing made at any time or times, heretofore or hereafter, and Purchaser and
its successors and assigns and, without limitation, all other persons and
entities, shall look solely to Seller’s assets for the payment of any claim or
for any performance, and Purchaser, on behalf of itself and its successors and
assigns, hereby waives any and all such personal liability. Notwithstanding
anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, neither the negative
capital account of any constituent member in Seller, nor any obligation of any
constituent member in Seller, to restore a negative capital account or to
contribute capital to Seller, shall at any time be deemed to be the property or
an asset of Seller (and neither Purchaser nor any of its successors or assigns
shall have any right to collect, enforce or proceed against or with respect to
any such negative capital account of member’s obligations to restore or
contribute). The provisions of this Section 12.2 shall survive the Closing
or any termination of this Agreement.
 
13.                            OPERATION OF THE PROPERTY. From and
after the Effective Date until the Closing Date or earlier termination of this
Agreement:
 
13.1                            Ordinary Course of
Business. Seller shall operate the Property in its ordinary course of
business (provided, that such obligation shall not include incurring any
capital expenditures except to the extent that the Property is unable to
operate reasonably as a Class A apartment building without such
expenditure) and shall not sell, further pledge, or otherwise transfer or
dispose of all or any part of any Property (except for such items of Personal
Property
 
21




 
as become obsolete or are disposed of in the ordinary course), subject
to the provisions of Section 5 above.
 
13.2                            Service Contracts.
Seller shall not enter into any new written service contract with respect to
the Property that will not be cancelable by Purchaser without penalty upon no
greater than thirty (30) days notice, without the prior written consent of
Purchaser.
 
13.3                            Property Insurance.
Seller shall maintain in full force and effect insurance coverages
substantially similar to Seller’s existing property insurance on the Property.
 
13.4                            Condition of Vacant
Units. At Closing, any units at the Property that are vacated at least five
(5) business days prior to Closing shall be put in rent ready condition by
Seller in accordance with Seller’s customary management practices at the
Property or Purchaser shall receive a credit at Closing in an amount necessary
to put any such unit in rent ready condition; provided, however, the amount of
any such credit shall not exceed the sum of $500.00 per unit.
 
13.5                            New Leases. Seller
shall keep, observe, and perform its obligations as landlord under the Leases,
and not enter into, or alter, amend or otherwise modify or supplement any
existing Lease to provide for a term in excess of one (1) year, without
the prior written consent of Purchaser. Seller shall not enter into any new
commercial or retail Leases or terminations, modifications, or extensions of
such Leases without first obtaining Purchaser’s prior written consent, which
shall not be unreasonably withheld. Purchaser’s consent shall be deemed to have
been tendered by Purchaser if Purchaser does not object within five
(5) business days after Purchaser’s receipt of Seller’s written inquiry.
 
13.6                            Pre-Closing Operations.
For a period of at least 72 hours before the Closing, Seller shall discontinue
data entry operations in the on-site computer system for the Property,
including making deposits of rental income. Seller acknowledges that such
discontinuance is intended to afford Seller and Purchaser an opportunity to
coordinate the transition of the Property in anticipation of Closing and to
complete work on prorations as set forth in this Agreement. Seller shall, as
soon as practicable after discontinuing such data entry (with Seller
endeavoring to do the same within two hours of such discontinuance), forward to
Purchaser or its designee final reports to facilitate transition planning and
compilation of prorations.
 
13.7                            Website. Seller
shall maintain the Website though the Closing. Promptly following Closing,
Seller and Purchaser shall work together in good faith, together with the
Website manager, to remove all references to Seller as owner and to the
property management company.
 
14.                                  MISCELLANEOUS.
 
14.1                            Indemnification Claims. The
indemnifications contained in this Agreement shall be subject to the following
provisions: the indemnitee shall notify indemnitor of any such claim against
indemnitee within thirty (30) days after it has written notice of such claim,
but failure to notify indemnitor shall in no case prejudice the rights of
indemnitee under this Agreement unless indemnitor shall be prejudiced by such
failure and then only to the extent
 
22




 
of such prejudice. Should indemnitor fail to discharge or undertake to
defend indemnitee against such liability within fifteen (15) business days
after the indemnitee gives the indemnitor written notice of the same, then
indemnitee may settle such liability, and indemnitor’s liability to indemnitee
shall be conclusively established by such settlement, the amount of such
liability to include both the settlement consideration and the reasonable costs
and expenses, including attorneys’ fees, incurred by indemnitee in effecting
such settlement. The obligations set forth in this Section 14.1 shall
survive the Closing or earlier termination of this Agreement.
 
14.2                            Entire Agreement.
All understandings and agreements heretofore had between Seller and Purchaser
with respect to the Property are merged in this Agreement, which alone fully
and completely expresses the agreement of the parties.
 
14.3                            Assignment. Except
for a one (1) time right to assign this Agreement, to a “Permitted
Assignee” (as hereinafter defined), neither this Agreement nor any interest
hereunder shall be assigned or transferred by Purchaser. For purposes of this
Agreement, the term “Permitted Assignee”
shall mean a legal entity controlled by Behringer Harvard Multifamily OP I LP.
To be effective, an assignment to a Permitted Assignee shall (i) only be
permitted following the expiration of the Review Period; (ii) be fully
executed by the assignor and the Permitted Assignee thereunder and delivered to
Seller as soon as practicable to afford Seller sufficient time before the
Closing Date to prepare the applicable closing documents reflecting the name
and signature block of the Permitted Assignee, and (iii) contain a
provision whereby the Permitted Assignee assumes all of the obligations of Purchaser
under this Agreement whether occurring before, as of or after the effective
date of such assignment. Upon both the assignment of this Agreement and the
Permitted Assignee’s delivery to Escrowee of the full amount of Closing funds
required to be delivered by Purchaser (or the Permitted Assignee) hereunder,
the original Purchaser will be released from all liabilities and obligations
under this Agreement as and to the extent that the Permitted Assignee has
assumed the same. Subject to the foregoing, this Agreement shall inure to the
benefit of and shall be binding upon Seller and Purchaser and their respective
successors and assigns.
 
14.4                            No Modification.
This Agreement shall not be modified or amended except in a written document
signed by Seller and Purchaser.
 
14.5                            Time of the Essence.
Time is of the essence of this Agreement.
 
14.6                            Governing Law. This
Agreement shall be governed and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the
State of Illinois.
 
14.7                           Notice. All notices,
requests, demands or other communications required or permitted under this
Agreement shall be in writing and delivered personally, by certified mail,
return receipt requested, postage prepaid, by overnight courier (such as
Federal Express), by facsimile transmission with a copy to follow by certified
mail, return receipt requested, postage paid or by overnight courier, or by
electronic mail (provided that receipt is confirmed by a return electronic mail
message sent by the recipient or an assistant thereof); provided, however,
notices sent pursuant to Section 7.1 or 7.2 may not be transmitted by
electronic mail. Notices shall be addressed as follows:
 
23



 
If to Seller:
 
c/o Stark Investments
3600 South Lake Drive
St. Francis, Wisconsin 53235
Telephone: (414) 294-7786
Facsimile: (414) 294-7986
Attention: Linda Gorens-Levey / Anthony Marino



Email:


 lgorens@starkinvestments.com




 


 amarino@starkinvestmetns.com



 
With copies to:
 
Quarles & Brady LLP
300 N. LaSalle Street, Suite 4000
Chicago, Illinois 60654
Telephone: (312) 715-5061
Facsimile: (312) 632-1733
Attention: Thomas A. McCarthy
Email: thomas.mccarthy@quarles.com
 
If to Purchaser:
 
Behringer Harvard Multifamily OP I LP 
15601 Dallas Parkway, Suite 600
Addison, Texas 75001
Telephone: 214-655-1600
Facsimile: 214-655-1610
Attention: Robert T. Poynter
Email: bpoynter@behringerharvard.com
 
With a copy to:
 
Miller, Egan, Molter & Nelson LLP
4514 Cole Avenue, Suite 1250
Dallas, Texas 75205
Telephone: 214-628-9502
Facsimile: 214-628-9505
Attention: Walter D. Miller
Email: walt.miller@MillerEgan.com
 
All notices given in accordance with the terms hereof shall be deemed
received on the next business day if sent by overnight courier, on the same day
if sent by facsimile or electronic mail before 5:00 p.m. (Chicago time) on
a business day, on the third (3rd) business day following deposit with the United
States Mail as a registered or certified matter with postage prepaid, or when
delivered personally or otherwise received or refused. Either party hereto may
change the
 
24




 
address for receiving notices, requests, demands or other communication
by notice sent in accordance with the terms of this Section 14.7.
 
14.8         Waiver
of Trial by Jury. IN ANY LAWSUIT OR OTHER PROCEEDING INITIATED BY PURCHASER
UNDER OR WITH RESPECT TO THIS AGREEMENT, PURCHASER WAIVES ANY RIGHT IT
MAY HAVE TO TRIAL BY JURY. IN ADDITION, PURCHASER WAIVES ANY RIGHT TO SEEK
RESCISSION OF THE TRANSACTION PROVIDED FOR IN THE AGREEMENT.
 
14.9         Confidentiality.
Without the prior written consent of Seller, Purchaser shall not issue a press
release or other media publicity of any kind whatsoever with respect to Seller
or this Agreement or disclose to any third party the existence of this
Agreement or any term or condition of this Agreement (including, without
limitation, the Purchase Price) or the results of any inspections or studies
undertaken in connection herewith. Notwithstanding the foregoing, after the
Closing, each of Seller and Purchaser shall have the right to issue a press
release solely announcing the purchase and sale of the Property and the
resulting ownership and control of the Property so long as the release does
not, except to the extent required by applicable law or as may otherwise be a
Permitted Disclosure (as hereafter defined), disclose the economic terms
thereof (a “Permitted Release”). Any press
release or media publicity other than a Permitted Release issued by either
Seller or Purchaser shall be subject to the review and approval of the other
party hereto (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or
delayed), except to the extent required by applicable law, in which event the
review and approval of the other party hereto shall not be required. Purchaser
agrees to keep confidential and not to use, other than in connection with its
determination whether to proceed with the purchase of the Property in
accordance with Section 8 hereof, any of the documents, material or
information regarding the Property or Seller supplied to Purchaser by Seller or
by any third party at the request of Seller, including, without limitation any
environmental site assessment reports and information concerning any employee
of Seller or Seller’s Affiliates furnished to Purchaser, except Purchaser may
share such documents, material and information with Purchaser’s consultants
(the “Purchaser’s Consultants”) on a “need to
know” basis, unless Purchaser is compelled to disclose such documents, material
or information by law or by subpoena. Purchaser agrees to indemnify and hold
harmless Seller from and against any and all losses, damages, claims and
liabilities of any kind (including, without limitation, attorney’s fees)
arising out of a breach by Purchaser or Purchaser’s Consultants of the
provisions of this Section 14.9. In the event that the Closing does not
occur in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, Purchaser shall promptly
return to Seller all hard copies (and shall permanently delete and destroy all
electronic copies) of the documents, materials and information regarding the
Property supplied to Purchaser by Seller or at the request of Seller.
Notwithstanding any provision of this Section 14.9 to the contrary or in
any other agreement to which any party hereto is bound, Purchaser and
Purchaser’s Consultants may disclose any information or documentation that
(i) is readily ascertainable by the general public (other than as a result
of a disclosure by Purchaser in violation of this Section 14.9),
(ii) was known to Purchaser prior to the Purchaser’s delivery of the
letter intent dated May 24, 2010, (iii) is deemed advisable by
Purchaser or its counsel to disclose to its officers, directors, members,
managers, employees, agents, consultants, members of professional firms serving
it or potential lenders, investors, consultants and brokers and others who need
to know such information or review such documentation for the purpose of
assisting Purchaser in connection with the transaction contemplated by this
Agreement so long as such
 
25




 
persons are informed by Purchaser of the confidential nature of such
information and are directed in writing by Purchaser to treat such information
confidentially, (iv) is required to be disclosed by applicable law, or
(v) is deemed advisable by Purchaser or its counsel to be disclosed in
connection with financial reporting, securities disclosures or other legal, tax
or financial requirements or guidelines imposed by law and applicable to
Purchaser or any affiliate thereof, including any disclosures to the Securities
and Exchange Commission (each, a “Permitted Disclosure”).
The provisions of this Section 14.9 shall survive the Closing or the
earlier termination of this Agreement.
 
14.10         Assignment
of Interest in Reports and Studies. If for any reason Purchaser does not
consummate the Closing, then Purchaser shall, upon Seller’s request and payment
by Seller to Purchaser of the actual out-of-pocket costs paid by Purchaser in
procuring same, assign and transfer to Seller all of its right, title and
interest in and to, and deliver to Seller, any and all third-party studies,
reports, surveys and other information, data and/or documents relating to the
Property or any part thereof prepared by or at the request of Purchaser, its
employees and agents (excluding, however, any underwriting or property
valuation analyses prepared by Purchaser).
 
14.11         Access
to Property Files. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in
this Agreement, Purchaser hereby agrees that following Closing, Seller shall
have, upon reasonable prior notice to Purchaser, access to all files at the
Property that relate to a dispute or a set of facts that could lead to a
dispute (a “Dispute”) between Seller and a
third party including, without limitation, a tenant of the Property with
respect to Seller’s period of ownership thereof; provided, however, all rights,
defenses, causes of action and claims relating to a Dispute and arising from
matters and events following the Closing Date shall belong to Purchaser. In
addition, all files at the Property that relate to tenants who have vacated
their units at the Property (the “Former Tenant Lease Files”),
together with any and all rights, defenses, causes of action and claims
relating thereto, shall remain the property of Seller. Former Tenant Lease
Files may be removed from the Property by Seller on or before Closing. The
provisions of this Section 14.11 shall survive the Closing.
 
14.12         No
Memorandum of Agreement. This Agreement or any notice or memorandum hereof
shall not be recorded in any public record. A violation of this prohibition
shall constitute a material breach by Purchaser, entitling Seller to terminate
this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, this Section 14.12 does not
prohibit any Permitted Disclosure and the making of any Permitted Disclosure by
Purchaser shall not be a default under this Section 14.12, but only so
long as Purchaser does not record or file this Agreement or any memorandum or
notice of this Agreement with the office of the Cook County Recorder of Deeds
or any other land records.
 
14.13         No
Finance Contingency. Purchaser acknowledges and agrees that Purchaser’s
obligations under this Agreement are not in any manner contingent or
conditioned upon Purchaser obtaining financing in order to Purchase the
Property. It is expressly understood that if Purchaser is unable to close the
transaction contemplated by this Agreement as a result of Purchaser’s failure
to obtain financing, Purchaser shall be in default under this Agreement and
Seller shall have the remedy provided in Section 7.2 above. In no event
shall Seller be obligated to comply with any requirements of Purchaser’s lender
or otherwise incur any cost, expense or liability in connection with
Purchaser’s financing of the Property.
 
26




 
14.14         Counterpart
Signatures. This Agreement may be signed in any number of counterparts each
of which shall be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together
shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
14.15         Designation
of Escrowee as Reporting Person. Seller and Purchaser hereby designate
Escrowee to act as and perform the duties and obligations of the “reporting
person” with respect to the transaction contemplated by this Agreement for
purposes of 26 C.F.R. Section 1.6045-4(e)(5) relating to the
requirements for information reporting on real estate transaction closed on or
after January 1, 1991.
 
14.16         Weekends
and Legal Holidays. Whenever the time for performance of a covenant or
condition required to be performed pursuant to the terms of this Agreement
falls upon a Saturday, Sunday or Federal or State of Illinois holiday, such
time for performance shall be extended to the next business day. Otherwise all
references herein to “days” shall mean calendar days.
 
14.17         Signatures.
Handwritten signatures to this Agreement transmitted by telecopy or electronic
transmission (for example, through use of a Portable Document Format or “PDF”
file) shall be valid and effective to bind the party so signing. Each party
agrees to promptly deliver to the other party an executed original of this
Agreement with its actual signature, but a failure to do so shall not affect
the enforceability of this Agreement, it being expressly agreed that each party
to this Agreement shall be bound by its own telecopied or electronically
transmitted handwritten signature and shall accept the telecopied or
electronically transmitted handwritten signature of the other party to this
Agreement.
 
14.18         Legal
Representation. Each party hereto has been represented by legal counsel in
connection with the negotiation of the transactions herein contemplated and the
drafting and negotiation of this Agreement. Each party hereto and its counsel
has had an opportunity to review and suggest revisions to the language of this
Agreement. Accordingly, no provision of this Agreement shall be construed for
or against or interpreted to the benefit or disadvantage of any party by reason
of any party having or being deemed to have structured or drafted such
provision.
 
14.19         Prevailing
Party Attorney Fees. If either Seller or Purchaser files suit to enforce
the obligations of the other party under this Agreement, the prevailing party
shall be entitled to recover the reasonable fees and expenses of its attorneys
from the non-prevailing party
 
14.20         3-14
Audit. Seller acknowledges that Purchaser may be required by applicable law
to have audited financial statements pertaining to the net operating income
(i.e. rental revenue, repairs and maintenance expenses, utilities, payroll,
real estate taxes, insurance, management fees, etc.) of the Property (but
not with respect to Seller or any of its affiliates) prepared with respect to
the period that is up to three (3) years prior to the Closing Date and
that Purchaser may cause to be prepared audited financial statements with
respect to the Property in compliance with the policies of Purchaser and
certain laws, including applicable regulations promulgated by the Securities
and Exchange Commission. Accordingly, Seller agrees to provide Purchaser and
its representatives with reasonable access to Seller’s books and records
relating to the financial operation of the Property only (and not with respect
Seller or any of its affiliates)
 
27




 
for a period of one (1) year after the Closing upon not less than
ten (10) business days’ advance written notice in order for Purchaser to
conduct the required audit, at Purchaser’s sole expense; provided, however,
Seller shall have no obligation to create or prepare any new financial
statements or reports, and Purchaser’s right to inspect the Seller’s books and
records relating to the financial operation of the Property shall be limited to
the Seller’s then existing books and records, in whatever form said books and
records then exist. Further, Purchaser hereby acknowledges and agrees that
Seller shall not be deemed to have made any representations or warranties with
respect to Seller’s books, records and other documents that Purchaser and/or
its representatives may review in connection with such audit, and Seller shall
have no liability to Purchaser or any other party in connection therewith.
Further, Purchaser hereby agrees to indemnify, defend and hold Seller harmless
from and against any and all claims, liabilities, loss, costs and damages
suffered by Seller in connection with Purchaser’s access to the books and
records described in this Section 14.20 and the audited financial
statements resulting therefrom. Purchaser shall reimburse Seller, on demand,
for any and all out-of-pocket costs reasonably incurred by Seller in
cooperating with such audit. The provisions of this Section 14.20 shall
survive Closing.
 
14.21         Title
Insurance. Seller agrees to use good faith, diligent efforts to cause the
Title Insurer, at Closing, to issue (or irrevocably commit to issue) the
Owner’s Policy required under this Agreement. If, however, the Title Insurer
fails or refuses to issue (or irrevocably commit to issue) said Owner’s Policy
at Closing, and provided that (i) Seller has utilized good faith, diligent
efforts to cause Title Insurer to issue (or irrevocably commit to issue) the
Owner’s Policy, (ii) Seller has delivered all customary indemnifications
and/or affidavits to the Title Insurer to enable the Title Insurer to issue (or
irrevocably commit to issue) the Owner’s Policy, and (iii) the failure of
the Title Insurer to issue (or irrevocably commit to issue) the Owner’s Policy
is not a result of any default of Seller hereunder, then, notwithstanding
anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the failure of the Title
Insurer to issue (or irrevocably commit to issue) said Owner’s Policy shall not
be deemed a default by Seller hereunder, and, in lieu thereof, and as its sole
recourse, Purchaser may elect to either (1) terminate this Agreement, in
which event the Earnest Money (specifically excluding the Option Fee, which
shall be paid to Seller) and any interest thereon net of investment charges
shall be forthwith returned to Purchaser, all obligations of the parties
hereunder shall terminate, and this Agreement shall otherwise have no further
force and effect (other than those matters which expressly survive early
termination of this Agreement), or (2) proceed to close the transactions
contemplated hereby in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, whereupon
Purchaser shall accept such form of title insurance policies, if any, as the Title
Insurer is then prepared to issue. Purchaser’s failure to make either of the
two elections described in the preceding sentence on or before the Closing Date
shall be deemed an election of option (2) above.
 
[Signature
Page Follows]
 
28




 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Seller and Purchaser have executed and delivered
this Agreement as of the date first above written.
 
 



 


SELLER:




 


 




 


STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC,




 


a Wisconsin limited liability company




 


 




 


 




 


By:


/s/ Linda Gorens-Levy




 


Name:


Linda Gorens-Levy




 


Its:


Authorized Signatory




 


 




 


 




 


PURCHASER:




 


 




 


BEHRINGER HARVARD MULTIFAMILY OP I, 




 


LP, a Delaware limited partnership




 


 




 


By: BHMF, Inc., a Delaware corporation




 


Its: General Partner




 


 



 



 


By:


/s/ Robert T. Poynter




 


Name:


Robert T. Poynter




 


Its:


Vice President



 
29




 
EXHIBITS
 
A — Legal Description
B — List of Personal Property
C — List of Service Contracts
D — Earnest Money Escrow Instructions
E — Permitted Exceptions
F — Exceptions to the Deed
G — Special Warranty Deed
H — Bill of Sale
I — Tenant Notice Letter
J — Assignment and
Assumption of Leases, Security Deposits and Service Contracts
K — Assignment of Intangibles
L — Rent Roll
M — [intentionally deleted]
N — Material Defects Affecting Property
O — Notice of Pending Litigation
P — Notice of Violations
 
30




 
BURNHAM
POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT A
 
LEGAL DESCRIPTION
 
PARCEL 1:
 
LOTS 4, 9 AND 10 IN BLOCK 111 IN E.K. HUBBARD’S SUBDIVISION OF BLOCKS
5, 60, 66, 75, 85, 104, 105, 108 THROUGH 112 IN SCHOOL SECTION ADDITION TO
CHICAGO IN SECTION 16, TOWNSHIP 39 NORTH, RANGE 14, EAST OF THE THIRD
PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS.
 
PARCEL 2:
 
LOTS 15, 16,21 AND 22 IN BLOCK 111 IN E.K. HUBBARD’S SUBDIVISION OF
BLOCKS 5, 60, 66, 75, 85, 104, 105, 109, 111 AND 112 IN SCHOOL
SECTION ADDITION TO CHICAGO OF SECTION 16, TOWNSHIP 39 NORTH, RANGE
14, EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, (EXCEPT THAT PART OF LOT 22
CONVEYED TO CITY OF CHICAGO, A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, BY WARRANTY DEED RECORDED
OCTOBER 17, 1983 AS DOCUMENT 26823367 DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
 
BEGINNING AT THE INTERSECTION OF THE SOUTH LINE OF LOT 22 AND THE
WEST LINE OF SOUTH CLARK STREET, AS WIDENED, THENCE WEST ALONG THE SOUTH LINE
OF SAID LOT A DISTANCE OF 101 FEET TO THE EAST LINE OF THE PUBLIC ALLEY, THENCE
NORTH ALONG THE EAST LINE OF SAID ALLEY A DISTANCE OF 2 FEET; THENCE
NORTHEASTERLY ALONG A STRAIGHT LINE A DISTANCE OF 102.14 FEET TO A POINT ON THE
WEST LINE OF SOUTH CLARK STREET, AS WIDENED, SAID POINT BEING 17.22 FEET NORTH
OF THE POINT OF BEGINNING, THENCE SOUTH ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SOUTH CLARK
STREET, AS WIDENED, A DISTANCE OF 17.22 FEET TO THE POINT OF
BEGINNING), IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS.
 
A-1



 
BURNHAM
POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT B 
 
LIST OF PERSONAL PROPERTY
 
Burnham
Pointe Inventory 6/7/2010
 



In Units:


 


Units


 




Refrigerators


 


298


 




Diswashers


 


298


 




Gas Ranges


 


298


 




Washer/Dryers


 


298


 




Microwaves


 


298


 



 



Party Room:


 


Units


 




Lounge Chairs


 


4


 




Cocktail Table


 


3


 




Bench Tables


 


2


 




Samsung 32” LCD Flat
  Screens


 


4


 




Samsung 46” LCD Flat
  Screens


 


2


 




Wall Brackets for TV’s


 


6


 




Bar Chairs


 


6


 




Pool Table


 


1


 




Couch


 


1


 




Lounge Chairs


 


2


 




set of pool sticks and
  balls


 


1


 




art pictures


 


2


 



 



Work Out Facilities:


 


 


 




Treadmills


 


4


 




Recumbant Bikes


 


2


 




Eliptical Machines


 


2


 




Weight Bench Sets


 


2


 




Conversion Recumbant Rower


 


1


 




Ball Set (ab)


 


1


 




Free Weight Set


 


1


 




Equipment Mats


 


8


 



 
B-1




 



37” LCD Flat Screen TV’s


 


3


 




Get Fit Lat/Row Machine


 


1


 




Get Fit Multiple Press
  machine


 


1


 




Get Fit Leg Curl/extension
  machine


 


1


 



 



Parking Garage:


 


 


 




Parking Equipment


 


1


 



 



Common Areas


 


 


 




Trash Compactor


 


1


 




Security System


 


1


 




Cameras


 


16


 



 



Business Center:


 


 


 




Conference Table


 


1


 




7 Conference Chairs


 


7


 




3 Computer


 


3


 




Computer Desk


 


1


 




3 Computer chairs


 


3


 




Printer (now located in
  the office)


 


1


 



 



Offices


 


 


 




Phones


 


7


 




computers


 


5


 




Desks


 


6


 



 



Patio Furniture:


 


 


 




2 Grills


 


2


 




4 patio tables with
  umbrellas


 


4


 




12 lounge chairs


 


12


 




16 chairs


 


16


 




8 padded chairs


 


8


 




1 padded couch


 


1


 




6 end tables


 


6


 



 



Supply Room


 


 


 




Carpet Shamppoer


 


1


 



 



706 Model


 


 


 




T297-0 PR TABLES


 


1


 




AVERILLE DRESSER


 


1


 




AVERILE NIGHTSTAND


 


2


 



 
B-2




 



DAWSON SOFA, FAB: SONNY
  ALOE


 


1


 




DINING TABLE


 


1


 




CHAIR


 


2


 




TV UNIT


 


1


 




SIDE CHAIR, DK BROWN


 


4


 




BED, ENTIRE BED


 


1


 




KING ROYAL SPLENDER, MATT
  ONLY


 


1


 




3/3 X 80 FOUNDATION


 


2


 




BECKETTE BUFFET


 


1


 




ARISTO HALIFAX TABLE


 


2


 




DESK & HUTCH


 


1


 




NOVA 25” STOOLS


 


3


 



 



703 Model


 


 


 




END TABLE


 


1


 




COCKTAIL


 


1


 




HEADBOARD, IVORY
  QUEEN,


 


1


 




LOVESEAT


 


1


 




DINING CHAIR, BROWN/CHROME


 


4


 




STOOL, WALNUT/NICKEL


 


2


 




FULL HEADBOARD
  FINISH:CHAMPAGNE


 


1


 




SERVER


 


1


 




DRAWER CHEST


 


1


 




NIGHTSTAND


 


1


 




REGAL SPLENDOR QUEEN SET
  W/RAILS


 


1


 




REGAL SPLENDOR FULL SET
  W/RAILS


 


1


 




FREEMAT


 


2


 




URBAN SAFARI


 


1


 




MILAN CHAIRS,
  FINISH:MOCHA,


 


2


 




TV CONSOLE


 


1


 




CHAIR, FAB: BARK,
  FINISH:AMERICANA


 


1


 




DINING TABLE


 


1


 




BRISTOL BENCH


 


1


 



 



Maintenance Equipment
  Inventory


 


 


 




CRESCENT NUT DRIVERS


 


1


 




FILE SET -10 PIECE SET


 


1


 




WATER HOSES


 


2


 




BLUE DUMPSTER


 


1


 




LUGGAGE CARTS


 


3


 



 
B-3




 



PORTER AIR COMPRESSOR


 


1


 




POULAN PRO AIR BLOWER


 


1


 




GENERAL ROD


 


1


 




GAS CANS


 


2


 




RIGID ROD


 


1


 




400A AC CLAMP METER


 


1


 




TUB DRAIN REMOVER


 


1


 




BENZOMATIC TORCHES


 


2


 




GREASE GUN


 


1


 




50FT ELECTRICAL CORD


 


1


 




BOSCH ROTARY HAMMER


 


1


 




PERFORMANCE KEY MACHINE


 


1


 




SANITAIRE FLOOR MACHINE


 


1


 




HOOVER SPIN SWEEP


 


1


 




SANITAIRE VACUUM


 


1


 




SKIL SAW


 


1


 




DEWALT COMBO SAW/DRILL


 


1


 




SHOP VAC RIGHT STUFF


 


1


 




6FT LADDER


 


1


 




3FT LADDER


 


1


 




12FT LADDER


 


1


 




SALT SPREADER


 


1


 




LOCKOUT TAG OUT KIT


 


1


 




COMPLIANCE CENTER


 


1


 




MSDS BOOK


 


1


 




YARD MACHINE SNOW BLOWER


 


1


 




SANITAIRE EXTRACTOR


 


1


 




SUNBEAM MICROWAVE


 


1


 




WORK PRO POWER WASHER


 


1


 




SNOW SHOVELS


 


2


 




ICE SCRAPER


 


1


 




JANITOR CART


 


2


 




DOLLY


 


1


 




POWER GRIP


 


2


 




VIPER BUFFER


 


1


 



 
B-4




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT C 
 
LIST OF SERVICE CONTRACTS
 



Contracts


 


Vendor




Apartment Advertising


 


Apartmentguide.com




Cable/Internet


 


MDU




Copier


 


Canon




Elevator Contract


 


Schindler




Exterminator


 


Smithereen




Fire Alarm Monitoring


 


Fox Valley Fire and Safety




Annual sprinkler test


 


Alliance Fire Protection




Fire panel test/extinguisher testing


 


Simplex Grinnell




Flower Delivery for lobby


 


Thomas Joseph Design




Furniture Rental


 


Brook Furniture




HVAC Contact


 


Advance Mechanical Systems




Key System


 


Keytrak




Plant rental


 


Plantscapes




Landscaping


 


Clarence Davids




Laundry


 


Cintas




Parking Garage


 


Standard Parking




Pool Equip/Supplies


 


Liquid Service




Telephone


 


Globalcom First Communications




Union Janitors/Doorstaff


 


Local 1 and 25




Utility Billing


 


Conservice




Waste Removal


 


Waste Management




Property Management


 


Draper and Kramer



 
C-1




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT D 
 
EARNEST MONEY ESCROW
INSTRUCTIONS
 
Chicago Title Insurance Company 
712 Main St., Suite 2000E
Houston, Texas 77002-3223
Attention: Jimmy Erwin
Telephone: 713-238-9191
Facsimile: 713-238-9190
Date:                                     ,
2010
 
TO:  Chicago Title Insurance Company 
 
Attn: Jimmy Erwin
 
The amount of Two Million and No/100ths Dollars ($2,000,000.00)
(together with any additional earnest money deposit hereafter made by
Purchaser, the “Escrow Deposit”) is deposited with
the Houston Chicago office of Chicago Title Insurance Company in escrow by
Behringer Harvard Multifamily OP I LP, a Delaware limited partnership, the “Purchaser” under that certain Real Estate Sale Agreement
(the “Agreement”), dated                                       ,
2010, with Stark Burnham Pointe LLC, a Wisconsin limited liability company, as
the “Seller”.
 
As escrowee, you are hereby directed to hold, deal with and dispose of
the Escrow Deposit in accordance with the following terms and conditions:
 
1.                                       You are to hold
the Escrow Deposit until: (a) you are in receipt of a joint order by the undersigned
Seller and Purchaser as to the disposition of the Escrow Deposit; (b) you
are in receipt of a written demand (the “Demand”) from either Seller or
Purchaser for the payment of the Escrow Deposit or any portion thereof; or
(c) you are in receipt of a copy of any notice from Purchaser received on
or before the end of the Review Period (as defined in the Agreement) and
terminating the Agreement pursuant to Section 8.1.1 thereof. Upon receipt
of any Demand, you are directed to so notify the other party, enclosing a copy
of the Demand. If within five (5) days after the non-demanding party has
received or is deemed to have received your notice of your receipt of the
Demand, you have not received from the non-demanding party its notice of
objection to the Demand, then you are to disburse the Escrow Deposit as
requested by the Demand. If within said five-day period you receive from the
non-demanding party its notice of objection to the Demand, then you are
directed to notify the other party, enclosing a copy of the notice of
objection, and you are to continue to hold the Escrow Deposit until you are in
receipt of a joint order as aforesaid, but after sixty (60) days you may
deposit the
 
D-1




 
Escrow Deposit with a Court of competent
jurisdiction. If you are in receipt of any notice described in the preceding
clause (c), then you are not required to obtain Seller’s approval thereof, and
you shall not withhold disbursement of the Escrow Deposit to Purchaser pending
receipt of Seller’s approval thereof; provided, however, that before you
disburse any portion of the Escrow Deposit to Purchaser you must first disburse
$250,000 to Seller (such amount representing Seller’s share of the “Option Fee” described in the Agreement).
 
2.                                       Notwithstanding
the foregoing, as escrowee, you are hereby expressly authorized to regard and
to comply with and obey any and all orders, judgments or decrees entered or
issued by any Court, and in case you obey or comply with any such order,
judgment or decree of any Court, you shall not be liable to either of the
parties hereto or any other person or entity by reason of such compliance,
notwithstanding any such order, judgment or decree be entered without jurisdiction
or be subsequently reversed, modified, annulled, set aside or vacated. In case
of any suit or proceeding regarding these Escrow Instructions, to which you are
or may at any time be a party, the undersigned Seller and Purchaser agree that
the non-prevailing party shall pay to you upon demand all reasonable costs and
expenses incurred by you in connection herewith.
 
3.                                       Any escrow fee
to be charged by you is to be borne equally by the undersigned Seller and
Purchaser.
 
4.                                       As escrowee,
you shall invest the Escrow Deposit in an interest-bearing savings or money
market account or short term U.S. Treasury Bills or similar cash equivalent
securities at one or more institutions approved by Purchaser, as the
undersigned Purchaser may direct. Any interest earned on the Escrow Deposit,
after you deduct your customary investment charges, shall become and be deemed
to be a part of the Escrow Deposit.
 
5.                                       All notices or
other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be personally
delivered or sent by overnight courier (such as Federal Express), by facsimile
transmission or by first class United States Mail, postage prepaid, registered
or certified (return receipt requested) to the respective addresses for the
Seller, Purchaser and escrowee as herein provided (with concurrent copies of
all such notices or communications being delivered to the parties’ respective
counsel at the addresses set forth herein). A notice is given on the date it is
personally delivered, sent by overnight courier or facsimile transmission, or
deposited with the United States Mail for delivery as aforesaid. A notice is
received on the date it is personally delivered, the day after sent if sent by
overnight courier or facsimile transmission or, if sent by mail as aforesaid,
on the date noted on the return receipt.
 
6.                                       Seller and
Purchaser may act hereunder either directly or through their respective
attorneys:
 
Seller’s attorney is:
 
Quarles & Brady LLP
300 N. LaSalle Street, Suite 4000
 
D-2




 
Chicago, Illinois 60654
Attn: Thomas A. McCarthy 
Telephone: (312) 715-5061 
Facsimile: (312) 632-1733
 
Purchaser’s attorney is:
 
Miller, Egan, Molter & Nelson LLP 
4514 Cole Avenue, Suite 1250 
Dallas, Texas 75205
Attn: Walter D. Miller
Telephone: (214) 628-9502
Facsimile: (214) 628-9505
 
7.                                       These Escrow
Instructions are being entered into to implement the Agreement and shall not
(nor be deemed to) amend, modify or supersede the Agreement or act as a waiver
of any rights, obligations or remedies set forth therein; provided, however,
that you may rely solely upon these Escrow Instructions.
 
8.                                       In case of any
suit or proceeding at law or in equity regarding the Escrow Deposit or these
Escrow Instructions, the non-prevailing party shall pay the prevailing party
all costs and expenses (including, but not limited to, attorney’s fees)
incurred by the prevailing party, and if such prevailing party shall recover
judgment in any such suit or proceeding, such costs and expenses (including but
not limited to attorneys’ fees) shall be included in and as a part of such
judgment.
 
9.                                       Seller and
Purchaser hereby designate Escrowee to act as and perform the duties and
obligations of the “reporting person” with respect to the transaction
contemplated by the Agreement for purposes of 26 C.F.R.
Section 1.6045-4(e)(5) relating to the requirements for information
reporting on real estate transaction closed on or after January 1, 1991.
 
10.                                 These Escrow
Instructions may be signed in any number of counterparts each of which shall be
deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute one
and the same instrument.
 
[SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOWS]
 
D-3




 
Agreed and Acknowledged this
18th day of June, 2010.
 
 



PURCHASER:


 


SELLER:




 


 


 




 BEHRINGER HARVARD


 


STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC,




 MULTIFAMILY OP I, LP, a Delaware


 


a Wisconsin limited liability company




 limited partnership


 


 




 


 


 




 By: BHMF, Inc., a Delaware corporation


 


By:


 




 Its: General Partner


 


Name:


 




 


 


Its:


 




 


 


 


 




By:


 


 


 


 




Name:


 


 


 


 




Its:


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 




Address:


 


Address:




 


 


 


 




Behringer Harvard Multifamily OP I LP 
15601 Dallas Parkway, Suite 600 
Addison, Texas 75001
Attn: Robert T. Poynter 
Telephone: 214-655-1600


 


c/o Stark Investments 
3600 South Lake Drive 
St. Francis, Wisconsin 53235 
Attn: Linda Gorens-Levey / Anthony Marino 
Telephone: (414) 294-7786



 
 
Agreed and Acknowledged this                      day
of                 ,
2010.
 
 



CHICAGO TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY




 


 




 


 




By:


 


 




Name:


 


 




Title:


 


 



 
D-4




 
BURNHAM
POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT E

 
PERMITTED
EXCEPTIONS
 
1.                                       Acts of
Purchaser, and those claiming by, through and under Purchaser.
 
2.                                       General and
special taxes and assessments not yet delinquent.
 
3.                                       Rights of
tenants in possession, as tenants only, under unrecorded Leases.
 
4.                                       Zoning,
building and other governmental and quasi-governmental laws, codes and
regulations.
 
5.                                       Water rights,
claims or title to water.
 
6.                                       All other
exceptions that become Permitted Exceptions in accordance with the provisions
of Section 3.
 
E-1




 
BURNHAM
POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT F 
 
EXCEPTIONS TO THE DEED
 
1.                                       Acts of Purchaser, and those
claiming by, through and under Purchaser.
 
2.                                       General and special taxes
and assessments not yet delinquent.
 
3.                                       Rights of tenants under
leases, and those claiming by, through and under said tenants.
 
4.                                       Zoning, building and other
governmental and quasi-governmental laws, codes and regulations.
 
5.                                       Any adverse
claim to any portion of the Property which has been created by artificial means
or has accreted to any such portion so created and riparian rights, if any.
 
6.                                       Covenants,
conditions, restrictions, and private or public utility easements of record
together with easements or claims of easements not shown by the public records.
 
7.                                       Encroachments,
overlaps, boundary line disputes, or other matters which would be disclosed by
an accurate survey or inspection of the Property.
 
8.                                       Add all other exceptions
that become Permitted Exceptions in accordance with the provisions of
Section 3.
 
F-1




 
BURNHAM
POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT G
 
When Recorded, Mail to:
 
 
 
 
SPECIAL
WARRANTY DEED
 
For the consideration of the sum of Ten Dollars ($10.00) and other
valuable considerations received, STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC, a Wisconsin limited
liability company (“Grantor”), does hereby convey to             ,
a(n)                (“Grantee”),
all of Grantor’s right, title and interest in and to the following described
real property (the “Property”) situated in Cook County, Illinois, together
with all improvements thereon and all of Grantor’s interest in any rights and
privileges solely appurtenant thereto:
 
SEE EXHIBIT A ATTACHED HERETO AND BY
THIS
REFERENCE MADE A PART HEREOF.
 
SUBJECT TO: the permitted exceptions set forth on Exhibit B
attached hereto and by this reference made a part hereof.
 
AND GRANTOR hereby binds itself and its successors
to warrant and defend the title against all of the acts of Grantor and no
other, subject to the matters set forth above.
 
Grantee, on behalf of itself, its successors and its
assigns, agrees to indemnify, defend and hold Grantor, Grantor’s affiliates,
and each of their respective members, partners, officers, directors, trustees,
parents, subsidiaries, shareholders, managers, beneficiaries, employees and
agents, harmless from and against any and all demands, claims, causes of
action, legal or administrative proceedings, losses, liabilities, damages,
penalties, fines, liens, judgments, costs or expenses whatsoever and of any
kind or nature (including, without limitation, court costs and reasonable
attorneys’ fees and disbursements arising out of any of the above), whether in
tort, contract or otherwise, and whether arising under statutes in effect in
the State of Illinois or otherwise, arising out of or directly relating to
claims made or brought by or on behalf of any party or parties who acquire or
contract to acquire any ownership interest in the Property following the filing
or recording of any document providing for the conversion of the Property to a
form of condominium ownership under any state or local law (including, without
limitation,
 
G-1



 
condominium and homeowner associations), and their successors and
assigns, in connection with or related to, the physical condition of the
Property prior to, at and subsequent to the date of this Deed, including,
without limitation, with respect to deficiencies (including, without
limitation, any latent or patent defect) in the design, specification,
surveying, planning, development, supervision or construction of an improvement
to the Property, or any injury arising out of any such deficiency, all structural
and seismic elements of the Property, all mechanical, electrical, plumbing,
sewage, heating, ventilating, air conditioning and other systems, the existence
of asbestos, mold, mildew or fungi and the environmental condition of the
Property.
 
The foregoing indemnification, covenants, conditions
and restrictions shall run with title to the Property herein described, and
shall inure to the benefit of, and shall be binding upon, Grantor and Grantee
and their respective heirs, successors and assigns. In the event of any sale,
transfer or other disposition of the Property by Grantee, Grantee shall
endeavor to provide Grantor with written notice thereof at least five
(5) business days prior to the effective date thereof. Such notice shall
be sent by nationally recognized overnight delivery service to:
 
c/o Stark Investments
3600 South Lake Drive
St. Francis, Wisconsin 53235 
Attention: Real Estate Manager
 
If any term or provision of this Deed or the
application thereof to any persons or circumstances shall, to any extent, be
invalid or unenforceable, the remainder of this Deed or the application of such
term or provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it
is held invalid or unenforceable shall not be affected thereby, and each term
and provision of this Deed shall be valid and enforced to the fullest extent
permitted by law.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Grantor has caused this Special
Warranty Deed to be executed this        day
of                 ,
2010.
 



 


GRANTOR:




 


 




 


STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC,




 


a Wisconsin limited liability company




 


 




 


 




 


By:


 




 


Name:


 




 


Its:


 



 
G-2




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT H
 
BILL OF SALE
 
THIS BILL OF SALE (this “Bill of Sale”) is executed as of the                               
day of 2010, by STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC, a Wisconsin limited liability company
(“Seller”), having offices at c/o Stark Investments, 3600 South Lake Drive, St.
Francis, Wisconsin 53235, in favor of                       a(n)                      
(“Purchaser”), having offices at                           .
 
1.             Real Property.
The “Real Property” shall mean the real property located in the County of Cook,
State of Illinois, commonly known as the Burnham Pointe Apartments and located
at 720-30 S. Clark Street, Chicago, Illinois.
 
2.             Personal
Property. The “Personal Property” shall mean those certain articles of
personal property used in connection with the operation of the Real Property
which are described in Exhibit A attached to this Bill of Sale.
 
3.             Sale. For
good and valuable consideration received by Seller, the receipt and sufficiency
of which are hereby acknowledged, Seller hereby sells, assigns and transfers
the Personal Property to Purchaser. Seller covenants and agrees to warrant and
forever defend title to the Personal Property unto Purchaser against any and
all persons lawfully claiming the whole or any part thereof by, through or
under Seller, and none other. Except as set forth in the immediately preceding
sentence, Seller makes no warranties or representations as to the Personal
Property. The Personal Property is transferred “AS IS” and ALL WARRANTIES OF
QUALITY, FITNESS AND MERCHANT ABILITY ARE HEREBY EXCLUDED.
 
[Signatures on Next Page]
 
 
H-1




 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Seller has executed this Bill of
Sale as of the day and year first above written.
 
 



 


SELLER:




 


 




 


STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC, 




 


a Wisconsin limited liability company




 


 




 


 


 




 


By:


 




 


Name:


 




 


Title:


 



 
 



PURCHASER’S ACKNOWLEDGEMENT AND RECEIPT:


 




 


 




PURCHASER:


 




 


 




 




By:


 


 




Name:


 


 




Title:


 


 



 
G-2




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT I
 
TENANT NOTICE LETTER
 
                                 ,
2010
 
Dear Tenant: 
 
Dear                                  ,
 
Stark Burnham Pointe LLC and the management team of
Burnham Pointe Apartments wish to inform you that as of                   ,
2010, Burnham Pointe Apartments will change ownership.
 
Stark Burnham Pointe LLC would like to thank you for
your residency at the Burnham Pointe Apartments and for allowing us to serve
your needs. Your security deposit will be transferred to the new owner, [INSERT
NEW OWNER’S NAME AND ADDRESS]. Please submit all future payments to the new
management company, as directed by the new owner.
 



 


Sincerely,




 


 




 


 




 


Property Manager




 


Burnham Pointe Apartments



 
I-1




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT J
 
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
OF LEASES, SECURITY DEPOSITS AND SERVICE CONTRACTS
 
THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION OF LEASES, SECURITY DEPOSITS AND SERVICE
CONTRACTS (this “Assignment”) is entered into as of the                             day
of                          
, 2010, between STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC, a Wisconsin limited liability company
(“Assignor”), having an office at c/o Stark Investments, 3600 South Lake Drive,
St. Francis, Wisconsin 53235 and                              ,
a(n)
                      
(“Assignee”) having an office at                             .
 
1.           Property.
The “Property” means the real property located in the City of Chicago, County
of Cook, State of Illinois, commonly known as “Burnham Pointe Apartments”,
together with the building, structures and other improvements located thereon.
 
2.           Leases.
The “Leases” means those leases, tenancies, rental agreements and occupancy
agreements affecting the Property which are described in Exhibit A
attached to this Assignment.
 
3.           Security
Deposits. “Security Deposits” means those security deposits held by or for
Assignor on account of tenants under the Leases as such deposits and with
respect to which Assignee received a credit at the closing of the transaction
with respect to which this Assignment has been executed and delivered. The
Security Deposits are set forth on attached Exhibit A.
 
4.           Service
Contracts. “Service Contracts” means those maintenance, supply and service
contracts relating to the Property which are described in Exhibit B
attached to this Assignment.
 
5.           Assignment.
For good and valuable consideration received by Assignor, the receipt and
sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Assignor hereby grants, transfers
and assigns to Assignee the entire right, title and interest of Assignor in and
to the Leases, the Security Deposits and the Service Contracts, but reserving
unto Assignor all uncollected rent attributable to the period prior to the date
hereof pursuant to Section 4.4.2 of that certain Real Estate Sale Agreement
for the Property by and between Assignor and Assignee (as may have been amended
from time to time, the “Agreement”).
 
6.           Assumption.
Assignee hereby assumes the covenants, agreements and obligations of Assignor
as landlord or lessor under the Leases as of the date of this Assignment, and
Assignee further assumes all liability of Assignor for the proper refund or
return of the Security Deposits if, when and as required by the Leases.
Assignee hereby assumes the covenants, agreements and obligations of Assignor
under the Service Contracts which are applicable to the
 
J-1




 
period and required to be performed from and after the date of this
Assignment, but not otherwise.
 
7.           Attorneys’
Fees. If either Assignee or Assignor, or their respective successors or
assigns, file suit to enforce the obligations of the other party under this
Assignment, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover the reasonable
fees and expenses of its attorneys.
 
8.           Successors
and Assigns. This Assignment shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit
of Assignor and Assignee and their respective successors and assigns.
 
9.           Limited
Liability. Assignor’s liability hereunder shall, at all times, be subject
to the limitations set forth in Section 12 of the Agreement.
 
10.         Counterparts.
This Assignment may be signed in any number of counterparts each of which shall
be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute
one and the same instrument.
 
[Signature Page Follows]
 
J-2




 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Assignor and Assignee have
executed and delivered this Assignment the day and year first above written.
 
 



 


ASSIGNOR:




 


 




 


STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC,




 


a Wisconsin limited liability company




 


 




 


 




 


By:


 




 


Name:


 




 


Title:


 




 


 




 


 




 


ASSIGNEE:




 


 




 


 


 




 


By:


 




 


Name:


 




 


Title:


 



 
J-3




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT K
 
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
OF INTANGIBLES
 
THIS ASSIGNMENT OF INTANGIBLES (this “Assignment”)
is made as of the              
day of                           ,
2010, between STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC, a Wisconsin limited liability company
(“Assignor”), having an office at c/o Stark Investments, 3600 South Lake Drive,
St. Francis, Wisconsin 53235 and                               ,
a(n)
                                 ,
(“Assignee”) having an office at                                  .
 
1.             Intangible
Property. The term “Intangible Property” shall have the meaning ascribed
thereto in that certain Real Estate Sale Agreement dated as of                      ,
2010 by and between Assignor, as Seller, and                        ,
as Purchaser, concerning the real property commonly known as “Burnham Pointe
Apartments” located in the City of Chicago, Cook County, Illinois.
 
2.           Assignment.
For good and valuable consideration received by Assignor, the receipt and
sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Assignor hereby grants, transfers
and assigns to Assignee, without representation or warranty of any kind, the
entire right, title and interest of Assignor in and to the Intangible Property,
but only to the extent transferable without third party consent or any cost or
liability to Assignor.
 
3.           Assumption.
Assignee hereby assumes the entire right, title and interest of Assignor in and
to the Intangible Property as of the date of this Assignment.
 
4.           Successors
and Assigns. This Assignment shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit
of Assignor and Assignee and their respective successors and assigns.
 
5.           Limited
Liability. Assignor’s liability hereunder shall, at all times, be subject
to the limitations set forth in Section 12 of the Agreement.
 
6.           Counterparts.
This Assignment may be signed in any number of counterparts each of which shall
be deemed to be an original and all of which taken together shall constitute
one and the same instrument.
 
[Signature
Page Follows]
 
K-1




 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Assignor has executed and
delivered this Assignment the day and year first above written.
 
 



 


ASSIGNOR:




 


 




 


STARK BURNHAM POINTE LLC,




 


a Wisconsin limited liability company




 


 




 


By:


 




 


Name:


 




 


Title:


 




 


 


 




 


 


 




 


ASSIGNEE:




 




 




 


By:


 




 


Name


 




 


Title:


 



 
K-2




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT L 
 
RENT ROLL
 
L-1




 
EXHIBIT M
 
[intentionally deleted]
 
M-1




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT N
 
MATERIAL DEFECTS AFFECTING
PROPERTY
 
1.             Various punctures /
holes in the membrane of the main roof.
 
N-1




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT O
 
PENDING LITIGATION
 
 
1.             None.
 
O-1




 
BURNHAM POINTE APARTMENTS
CHICAGO, ILLINOIS
 
EXHIBIT P 
 
NOTICE OF VIOLATIONS
 
1.                                       Municipal Code
Violation of Section 13-20-550 for installing parking sign without required
permit — application for required permit for parking sign has been submitted to
the City of Chicago.
 
P-1

 


